District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.03

Single-member districts.

(a)

The Council shall, by act, establish single-member districts for each of the neighborhood commission areas in § 1-309.02. Such districts shall be established in a timely manner following the receipt of alternate plans from the ward task forces on Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, established by § 1-1041.01. Each single-member district shall have a population of approximately 2,000 people, and shall be as nearly equal as possible. The boundaries of the single-member districts shall conform to the greatest extent possible with the boundaries of the census blocks which are established by the United States Bureau of the Census. Each advisory neighborhood commission area shall be located to the greatest extent possible within the boundaries of 1 election ward. An advisory neighborhood commission area may be located within 2 election wards if the location results from the limitations of census geography or if the location promotes a rational public policy, including, but not limited to, respect for the natural geography of the District, neighborhood cohesiveness, or the development of compact and contiguous areas. Upon adoption of the act establishing such districts, the Council shall cause a description of the boundaries of each such district to be published in the District of Columbia Register.

(b)

The Council shall, by act after public hearing by the Council’s Committee of the Whole, make such adjustments in the boundaries of the Advisory Neighborhood Commission single-member districts and the Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas as are necessary as a result of population shifts and changes. Such adjustments shall be made in a timely manner following the receipt of alternative plans from the ward task forces on Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, established by § 1-1041.01. Any adjustments made less than 180 days prior to a regularly scheduled election shall not be effective for that election.

History

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 4, 22 DCR 2066
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 4, 22 DCR 2472
June 23, 1981, D.C. Law 4-14, § 2(a), 28 DCR 2132
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-87, § 5(a), 29 DCR 433
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-199, § 7, 30 DCR 119
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-13, § 3, 30 DCR 2433
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-111, § 2(a), 31 DCR 3952
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-240, § 3, 38 DCR 337

Cross References

Elections, ward task forces, reports, see § 1-1041.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1041.02, § 25-336, and § 25-340.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-254.
1973 Ed., § 1-171b.

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-145 establishes boundaries for Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas and single-member districts within Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas.
Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-145 provided:
“Sec. 3. Applicability of boundaries.
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the ANC and SMD boundaries set forth in section 2(a) shall apply as of January 2, 2013.
“(b) The ANC and SMD boundaries set forth in section 2(a) shall apply for purposes of administering the November 6, 2012 election, including determining qualifications for candidacy and the residence of a person signing a nominating petition for the November 6, 2012 election.”
Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 19-145 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) establishment of boundaries, see § 2 of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Boundaries Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-359, April 30, 2002, 49 DCR 4639).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Boundaries Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-451, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 7873).
For temporary (90 day) establishment and applicability of Advisory Neighborhood Commission and single-member district area boundaries, see §§ 2, 3 of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Boundaries Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-341, April 8, 2012, 59 DCR 2788).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Advisory Neighborhood Commission 5C Allotments Authorization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-297, March 14, 2014, 61 DCR 2564, 20 DCSTAT 3064).

Editor's Notes

District boundaries established: Pursuant to §§ 1-309.03 and 1-1011.01, § 2 of D.C. Law 5-13 established the boundaries of both Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas and single-member districts within Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas.

District boundaries established: D.C. Law 6-7, effective July 17, 1985, amended the narrative descriptions of the boundaries of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions 5A, 5B, 8A and 8C, and amended the map description of the boundaries of Advisory Neighborhood Commission 8A.

Pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, § 2 of D.C. Law 9-112 established the boundaries of both Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas and single-member districts within Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas.

D.C. Law 9-174, effective October 3, 1992, amended D.C. Law 9-112 to change the boundaries of single-member districts 1C03, 1C04, and 1C05.

Pursuant to section (a) of this section, § 2 of D.C. Law 14-133, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 14-213, established boundaries for Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas and single-member districts within Advisory Neighborhood Commission areas.

Section 18 of D.C. Law 14-310 amended § 2(a) of D.C. Law 14-133 to change the narrative descriptions of the boundaries of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions SMD 3D01 and SMD 3D06.

Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 19-157 established, pursuant to section 4(a) of the Advisory Neighborhood Councils Act of 1975, effective October 10, 1975 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.03(a)), Advisory Neighborhood Commission (“ANC”) areas and single-member district (“SMD”) areas within ANC areas, the boundaries of which shall be depicted on the official maps of the District of Columbia according to the following legal descriptions:

Description of ANC 1A Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Spring Road; East on Spring Road to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Rock Creek Church Road; Northeast on Rock Creek Church Road to Park Place; South on Park Place to Michigan Avenue; West on Michigan Avenue to Columbia Road; West on Columbia Road to Sherman Avenue; South on Sherman Avenue to Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Girard Street; West on Girard Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to the continuation of Girard Street; West on Girard Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Fuller Street; West on Fuller Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Spring Road the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Spring Road; East on Spring Road to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Ogden Street; Northwest on Ogden Street to Perry Place; West on Perry Place to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Spring Road, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Perry Place; East on Perry Place to Ogden Street; Southeast on Ogden Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Newton Street; East on Newton Street to Holmead Place; South on Holmead Place to Monroe Street; Southwest on Monroe Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Newton Street; Northwest on Newton Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Perry Place, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Irving Street; East on Irving Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Columbia Road; West on Columbia Road to Harvard Court; South along a line bearing due south from the intersection of Columbia Road and Harvard Court to its intersection with Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Columbia Road; Southwest on Columbia Road to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Irving Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Spring Road and 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Newton Street; East on Newton Street to Holmead Place; South on Holmead Place to Park Road; Northeast on Park Road to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Spring Road; West on Spring Road to 14th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Newton Street; Southeast on Newton Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Monroe Street; Northeast on Monroe Street to Holmead Place; South on Holmead Place to Park Road; Southwest on Park Road to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Irving Street; West on Irving Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Newton Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street and Park Road; Northeast on Park Road to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Monroe Street; East on Monroe Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to Lamont Street; East on Lamont Street to Sherman Avenue; South on Sherman Avenue to Kenyon Street; West on Kenyon Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to Irving Street; West on Irving Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Park Road, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Spring Road and 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Monroe Street; East on Monroe Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to Lamont Street; East on Lamont Street to Sherman Avenue; North on Sherman Avenue to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Spring Road; Northwest on Spring Road to 13th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Monroe Street and Park Road; East on Park Road to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Newton Place; East on Newton Place to Warder Street; South on Warder Street to Park Road; East on Park Road to Park Place; North on Park Place to Rock Creek Church Road; West on Rock Creek Church Road to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Monroe Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Monroe Street and Park Road; East on Park Road to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Newton Place; East on Newton Place to Warder Street; South on Warder Street to Lamont Street; West on Lamont Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to Keefer Place; West on Keefer Place to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Kenyon Street; West on Kenyon Street to Sherman Avenue; North on Sherman Avenue to Monroe Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A10 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Sherman Avenue and Kenyon Street; South on Sherman Avenue to Columbia Road; East on Columbia Road to Michigan Avenue; East on Michigan Avenue to Park Place; North on Park Place to Park Road; West on Park Road to Warder Street; South on Warder Street to Lamont Street; West on Lamont Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to Keefer Place; West on Keefer Place to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Kenyon Street; West on Kenyon Street to Sherman Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A11 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Kenyon Street and Sherman Avenue; South on Sherman Avenue to Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Columbia Road; West on Columbia Road to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Irving Street; East on Irving Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to Kenyon Street; East on Kenyon Street to Sherman Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1A12 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Columbia Road; South on 16th Street to Fuller Street; East on Fuller Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Girard Street; East on Girard Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to the continuation of Girard Street; East on Girard Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Columbia Road; West on Columbia Road to Harvard Court; South along a line bearing due south from the intersection of Columbia Road and Harvard Court to its intersection with Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Columbia Road; Southwest on Columbia Road to 16th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 1B Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Fuller Street and 16th Street; East on Fuller Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Girard Street; East on Girard Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to the continuation of Girard Street; East on Girard Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Harvard Street; East on Harvard Street to Sherman Avenue; North on Sherman Avenue to Columbia Road; East on Columbia Road to Michigan Avenue; East and then southeast on Michigan Avenue to 1st Street; South on 1st Street to Bryant Street; West on Bryant Street to 2nd Street; South on 2nd Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to Florida Avenue; Northwest on Florida Avenue to T Street; West on T Street to Wiltberger Street; South on Wiltberger Street to S Street; West on S Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to U Street; West on U Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Fuller Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 2nd Street and V Street; South on 2nd Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to Florida Avenue; Northwest on Florida Avenue to T Street; West on T Street to Wiltberger Street; South on Wiltberger Street to S Street; West on S Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to V Street; East on V Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to W Street; East on W Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to V Street; East on V Street to 2nd Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of S Street and 8th Street; North on 8th Street to V Street; West on V Street to Florida Avenue; Northwest on Florida Avenue to W Street; West on W Street to 10th Street; North on 10th Street to Florida Avenue; West on Florida Avenue to 12th Street; South on 12th Street to S Street; East on S Street to 8th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 13th Street and Clifton Street; North on 13th Street to Fairmont Street; East on Fairmont Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Girard Street; East on Girard Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to Fairmont Street; West on Fairmont Street to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to Sherman Avenue; South on Sherman Avenue to Barry Place; West on Barry Place to Florida Avenue; Northwest on Florida Avenue to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to 12th Street; South on 12th Street to Clifton Street; West on Clifton Street to 13th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 12th Street and Florida Avenue; West on Florida Avenue to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Belmont Street; West on Belmont Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to V Street; East on V Street to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to Florida Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to V Street; East on V Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Florida Avenue; Northeast on Florida Avenue to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Chapin Street; West on Chapin Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to New Hampshire Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Chapin Street and 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Euclid Street; East on Euclid Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Clifton Street; East on Clifton Street to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to Euclid Street; East on Euclid Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to Florida Avenue; West on Florida Avenue to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Belmont Street; West on Belmont Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Chapin Street; West on Chapin Street to 15th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Euclid Street; North on 16th Street to Fuller Street; East on Fuller Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Girard Street; East on Girard Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Fairmont Street; West on Fairmont Street to University Place; South on University Place to Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to the continuation of Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to 16th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 13th Street and Girard Street; West on Girard Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Fairmont Street; West on Fairmont Street to University Place; South on University Place to Euclid Street; East on Euclid Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Clifton Street; East on Clifton Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Girard Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 13th Street and Fairmont Street; North on 13th Street to Harvard Street; East on Harvard Street to Sherman Avenue; North on Sherman Avenue to Columbia Road; East on Columbia Road to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Fairmont Street; West on Fairmont Street to 13th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B10 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Columbia Road; East on Columbia Road to Michigan Avenue; East and then southeast on Michigan Avenue to 1st Street; South on 1st Street to Bryant Street; West on Bryant Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Howard Place; West on Howard Place to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to Fairmont Street; East on Fairmont Street to the continuation of 6th Street; North on 6th Street to Girard Street; West on Girard Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Columbia Road, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B11 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Sherman Avenue and Euclid Street; South on Sherman Avenue to Barry Place; West on Barry Place to 10th Street; South on 10th Street to W Street; East on W Street to Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to V Street; East on V Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to W Street; East on W Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to V Street; East on V Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to Bryant Street; West on Bryant Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Howard Place; West on Howard Place to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to Fairmont Street; West on Fairmont Street to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to Sherman Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1B12 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of U Street, and New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to V Street; East on V Street to 12th Street; South on 12th Street to S Street; West on S Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to U Street; West on U Street to New Hampshire Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 1C Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and U Street; West on U Street to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to Rock Creek; North along Rock Creek to its intersection with a line extending Harvard Street from the east; East along said line extending Harvard Street to Harvard Street; East on Harvard Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to U Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 18th Street and Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to Wyoming Avenue; East on Wyoming Avenue to 20th Street; North on 20th Street to Kalorama Road; East on Kalorama Road to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Wyoming Avenue; East on Wyoming Avenue to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to Florida Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Wyoming Avenue; East on Wyoming Avenue to 20th Street; North on 20th Street to Kalorama Road; East on Kalorama Road to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to Biltmore Street; East on Biltmore Street to Cliffbourne Place; North on Cliffbourne Place to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to Rock Creek; Southwest along Rock Creek to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Wyoming Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 19th Street and Wyoming Avenue; East on Wyoming Avenue to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Columbia Road; Southwest on Columbia Road to Biltmore Street; West on Biltmore Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Wyoming Avenue, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Calvert Street and Rock Creek; North along Rock Creek to its intersection with a line extending Harvard Street from the east; East along said line extending Harvard Street to Harvard Street; East on Harvard Street to Adams Mill Road; Southwest on Adams Mill Road to Summit Place; East on Summit Place to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to Ontario Road; Southeast on Ontario Road to Lanier Place; Southwest on Lanier Place to Calvert Street; East on Calvert Street to Adams Mill Road; Southeast on Adams Mill Road to Columbia Road; Southwest on Columbia Road to Biltmore Street; West on Biltmore Street to Cliffbourne Place; North on Cliffbourne Place to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to Rock Creek, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Adams Mill Road and Summit Place; East on Summit Place to 18 Street; South on 18th Street to Ontario Road; Southeast on Ontario Road to Lanier Place; Northeast on Lanier Place to Quarry Road; Southeast on Quarry Road to Columbia Road; Northeast on Columbia Road to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to Adams Mill Road; Southwest on Adams Mill Road to Summit Place, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Columbia Road and 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Kalorama Road; Southwest on Kalorama Road to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to Euclid Street; West on Euclid Street to Ontario Road; North on Ontario Road to Columbia Road; Northeast on Columbia Road to the continuation of Ontario Road; Northwest on Ontario Road to Lanier Place; Northeast on Lanier Place to Quarry Road; Southeast on Quarry Road to Columbia Road; Northeast on Columbia Road to 16th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 18th Street and Florida Avenue; North on 18th Street to Adams Mill Road; Northwest on Adams Mill Road to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to Lanier Place; Northeast on Lanier Place to Ontario Road; Southeast on Ontario Road to Columbia Road; Southwest on Columbia Road to the continuation of Ontario Road; South on Ontario Road to Euclid Street; East on Euclid Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Kalorama Road; Southwest on Kalorama Road to Ontario Road; South on Ontario Road to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to Seaton Street; East on Seaton Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to U Street; West on U Street to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to 18th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1C08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Kalorama Road; Southwest on Kalorama Road to Ontario Road; South on Ontario Road to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to Seaton Street; East on Seaton Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to U Street; East on U Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Kalorama Road, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 1D Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Rock Creek and a line extending Piney Branch Parkway from the east; East along said line extending Piney Branch Parkway to Piney Branch Parkway; Continuing east on Piney Branch Parkway to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to its end; Continuing west along a line extending Harvard Street to the west to Rock Creek; North along Rock Creek to its intersection with a line extending Piney Branch Parkway from the east, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 18th Street and Newton Street; East and then southeast on Newton Street to Brown Street; Northeast on Brown Street to Oak Street; Southeast on Oak Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Monroe Street; Northwest on Monroe Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Kenyon Street; West on Kenyon Street to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Newton Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1D02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 17th Street and Newton Street; North on 17th Street to Piney Branch Parkway; Northeast on Piney Branch Parkway to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Oak Street; Northwest on Oak Street to Brown Street; Southwest on Brown Street to Newton Street; Northwest on Newton Street to 17th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 17th Street and Newton Street; North on 17th Street to Piney Branch Parkway; Southwest on Piney Branch Parkway to Beach Drive; Continuing southwest along a line extending Piney Branch Parkway to Rock Creek; Southwest along Rock Creek to Klingle Road; East on Klingle Road to Walbridge Place; South on Walbridge Place to Lamont Street; East on Lamont Street, and continuing east on a line extending Lamont Street to 19th Street; Southeast on 19th Street to Kilbourne Place; East on Kilbourne Place to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Newton Street; East on Newton Street to 17th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Monroe Street; Northwest on Monroe Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Irving Street; East on Irving Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Monroe Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 1D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Irving Street; South on 16th Street to Harvard Street; West on Harvard Street to its end; Continuing west on a line extending Harvard Street to Rock Creek; Northwest along the centerline of Rock Creek to Klingle Road; East on Klingle Road to Walbridge Place; South on Walbridge Place to Lamont Street; East on Lamont Street, and continuing east on a line extending Lamont Street to 19th Street; Southeast on 19th Street to Kilbourne Place; East on Kilbourne Place to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to Kenyon Street; East on Kenyon Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Irving Street; East on Irving Street to 16th Street, the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 2A Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of Rock Creek and a line extending N Street from the east; East on said line to N Street; East on N Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to Ward Place; Southeast on Ward Place to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to N Street; East on N Street to 20th Street; South on 20th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to 17th Street; East on Pennsylvania Avenue to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Independence Avenue, S.W.; East on Independence Avenue, S.W. to 14th Street, S.W.; Southwest on 14th Street, S.W. to the George Mason Memorial Bridge; Continuing southwest on the George Mason Memorial Bridge to the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line at the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Northwest on the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line to its intersection with the Theodore Roosevelt Memorial Bridge; Northeast from said intersection across the Potomac River to the center of the mouth of Rock Creek; Northeast along the centerline of Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 17th Street and Pennsylvania Avenue; East on Pennsylvania Avenue to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Independence Avenue, S.W.; East on Independence Avenue, S.W. to 14th Street, S.W.; Southwest on 14th Street, S.W. to the George Mason Memorial Bridge; Continuing southwest on the George Mason Memorial Bridge to the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Northwest along the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line to its intersection with the Arlington Memorial Bridge; Northeast on the Arlington Memorial Bridge to its intersection with the northeastern shoreline of the Potomac River; Southeast along said shoreline of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending 23rd Street, N.W. to the south; North along said line to 23rd Street; Continuing north on 23rd Street to the E street Expressway; East on the E Street Expressway to 21st Street; North on 21st Street to F Street; East on F Street to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of Rock Creek with a line extending N Street from the east; East on said line to N Street; Continuing east on N street to 23rd Street South on 23rd Street to L Street; West on L Street to 24th Street; South on 24th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest along Pennsylvania Avenue to the centerline of Rock Creek; Northeast along the centerline of Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Pennsylvania Avenue and the centerline of Rock Creek; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to 24th Street; South on 24th Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to I Street; West on I Street to 26th Street; North on 26th Street to K Street; West on K Street to the centerline of Rock Creek; Northwest along the centerline of Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of Rock Creek and K Street; East on K Street to 26th Street; South on 26th Street to I Street; East on I Street to 24th Street; South on 24th Street to Virginia Avenue; Northwest on Virginia Avenue to 25th Street; South on 25th Street to F Street; East on a line extending F Street to the centerline of I-66; South on said centerline of 1-66 to the E Street Expressway; East on the E Street Expressway to 23rd Street; South on 23rd Street to Lincoln Memorial Circle; Continuing south along a line extending 23rd Street to its intersection with the northeast shoreline of the Potomac River; Northwest along said shoreline of the Potomac River to the Arlington Memorial Bridge; Southwest on the Arlington Memorial Bridge to the District of Columbia—Commonwealth of Virginia boundary at the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Northeast along said shoreline of the Potomac River to its intersection with the Theodore Roosevelt Memorial Bridge; Northeast from said intersection to the center of the mouth of Rock Creek; North along the centerline of Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 24th Street and H Street; East on H Street to 23rd Street; South on 23rd Street to the E Street Expressway; West on the E Street Expressway to the centerline of I-66; North on said centerline of I-66 to its intersection with a line extending F Street from the west; West on said line to F Street Continuing west on F Street to 25th Street; North on 25th Street to Virginia Avenue; Southeast on Virginia Avenue to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of N Street and 23rd Street; East on N Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to Ward Place; Southeast on Ward Place to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire to N Street; East on N Street to 20th Street; South on 20th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to Washington Circle; Continuing northwest on a line extending Pennsylvania Ave across Washington Circle to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to L Street; East on L Street to 23rd Street; North on 23rd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 24th and Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to I Street; West on I Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to F Street; East on F Street to 21st Street; South on 21st Street to the E Street Expressway; West on the E Street Expressway to 23rd Street; North on 23rd Street to H Street; West on H Street to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to I Street; West on I Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2A08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of I Street and Pennsylvania Avenue; Southwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to F Street; West on F Street to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to I Street; East on I Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 2B Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Florida Avenue and 19th Street; Northeast on Florida Avenue to U Street; East on U Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to S Street; West on S Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Vermont Avenue; Southwest on Vermont Avenue to H Street; East on H Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; West on Pennsylvania Avenue to 20th Street; North on 20th Street to N Street; West on N Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Ward Place; Northwest on Ward Place to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to N Street; West on N Street to 25th Street; Continuing west on a line extending N Street west to the centerline of Rock Creek; North along the centerline of Rock Creek to P Street; East on P Street to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to Florida Avenue; Northeast on Florida Avenue to the point of beginning; [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Florida Avenue and 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Swann Street; East on Swann Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Riggs Place; West on Riggs Place to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to R Street; West on R Street to Florida Avenue; Northeast on Florida Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Florida Avenue and R Street; East on R Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Dupont Circle; Clockwise around Dupont Circle to its southwestern intersection with New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to O Street; West on O Street to 23rd Street; North on 23rd Street to P Street; East on P Street to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to Florida Avenue; Northeast on Florida Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New Hampshire Avenue and 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Dupont Circle; Counter-clockwise around Dupont Circle to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to R Street; East on R Street to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to Riggs Place; East on Riggs Place to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 17th Street and S Street; East on S Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 17th Street and Q Street; East on Q Street to 15th Street; South on 15 Street to Vermont Avenue; Southwest on Vermont Avenue to H Street; East on H Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; West on Pennsylvania Avenue to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of P Street and 23rd Street; South on 23rd Street to O Street; East on O Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Dupont Circle; Counter-clockwise around Dupont Circle to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Jefferson Place; East on Jefferson Place to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 20th Street; North on 20th Street to N Street; West on N Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Ward Place; Northwest on Ward Place to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to N Street; West on N Street to 25th Street; Continuing west along a line extending N Street west to the centerline of Rock Creek; North on the centerline of Rock Creek to P Street; East on P Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New Hampshire Avenue and Q Street; East on Q Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to Jefferson Place; West on Jefferson Place to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to Dupont Circle; Counter-clockwise around Dupont Circle to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Florida Avenue and U Street; East on U Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to T Street; West on T Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Swann Street; West on Swann Street to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to Florida Avenue; Northeast on Florida Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2B09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and U Street; East on U Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to S Street; West on S Street to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to T Street; East on T Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 2C Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of I Street and Vermont Avenue; East on I Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to Mt. Vernon Place; East on Mt. Vernon Place to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to the eastern boundary of Interstate 395; South on along the eastern boundary of Interstate 395 to the point where it crosses beneath Constitution Avenue; East on Constitution Avenue to its intersection with a line extending north from the center line of South Capitol Street through the center of the Capitol building; South along said line to Independence Avenue; West on Independence Avenue to 15th Street, S.W.; North on 15th Street, S.W. to 15th Street; Continuing north on 15th Street to H Street; West on H Street to Vermont Avenue; North on Vermont Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2C01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of I Street and Vermont Avenue; East on I Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to Mt. Vernon Place; East on Mt. Vernon Place to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to H Street; West on H Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to E Street; West on E Street to 9th Street; South on 9th Street to Independence Avenue, SW; West on Independence Avenue to 15th Street, S.W.; North on 15th Street, S.W. to 15th Street; Continuing north on 15th Street to H Street; West on H Street to Vermont Avenue; North on Vermont Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Massachusetts Ave and 5th Street; Southeast on Massachusetts Ave to the eastern boundary of Interstate 395; South along the eastern boundary of Interstate 395 to its intersection with a line projected east from G Street; West along said line to G Street; Continuing West on G Street to 5th Street; North along 5th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 6th Street and H Street; East on H Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to G Street; East on G Street and continuing east along a line projecting G Street to the eastern boundary of Interstate 395; South along said eastern boundary of Interstate 395 to the point where it crosses beneath Constitution Avenue; East on Constitution Avenue to its intersection with a line extending north from the center line of South Capitol Street through the center of the Capitol building; South along said line to Independence Avenue; West on Independence Avenue, S.W. to 9th Street, S.W.; North on 9th Street, S.W. to 9th Street; Continuing north on 9th Street to E Street; East on E Street to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 2D Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Rock Creek; South on Connecticut Avenue to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to P Street; West on P Street to Rock Creek; North on Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Rock Creek; South on Connecticut Avenue to California Street; West on California Street to 23rd Street; South on 23rd Street to Bancroft Place; West on Bancroft Place to 24th Street; South on 24th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Rock Creek; Northeast on Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2D02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and California Street; South on Connecticut Avenue to Florida Avenue; Southwest on Florida Avenue to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to P Street; West on P Street to Rock Creek; North on Rock Creek to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to Bancroft Place; East on Bancroft Place to 23rd Street; North on 23rd Street to California Street; East on California Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 2E Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover Archbold Park and the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park; South along the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park and along a line extending the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park south to the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line at the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; South along the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line to its intersection with the Theodore Roosevelt Memorial Bridge; Northeast from said intersection to the center of the mouth of Rock Creek; North along the centerline of Rock Creek to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest along Massachusetts Avenue to Whitehaven Street; West on Whitehaven Street to the northwest boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park; West along the northwest boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park to Whitehaven Street; West on Whitehaven Street to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to 35th Street; South on 35th Street to Whitehaven Parkway; West on Whitehaven Parkway to the southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover Archbold Park; West on said boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover Archbold Park and the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park; South along the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park to the Georgetown Medical Center Service road just south of the New Research Building; East on said road to the Lombardi Cancer Center; Continuing east along the southern edge of the Lombardi Cancer Center to the Pasquerilla Health Center; South along the western edge of the Pasquerilla Health Center to the Leavey parking garage; East along the northern edge of the Leavey parking garage to the existing campus road immediately to the east of the garage. North on said road to Reservoir Road; East on Reservoir Road to 35th Street; North on 35th Street to S Street; East along a line extending S Street east to 34th Street; North on 34th Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to 35th Street; South on 35th Street to Whitehaven Parkway; West on Whitehaven Parkway to the southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover Archbold Park; Continuing west along the southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover Archbold Park to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 38th Street and Reservoir Road; South along the existing Georgetown University campus road to a point equidistant from the Darnall Hall building and the westernmost Henle Village building; Northeast along a line equidistant from the Darnall Hall building and the Henle Village buildings until extending as far north as the northwest corner of the northernmost Henle Village building; East to the western property boundary of the Georgetown Visitation School; Counterclockwise around the property boundary of the Georgetown Visitation School to P Street; East on P Street to 35th Street; North on 35th Street to Volta Place; East on Volta Place to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to Q Street; East on Q Street to 32nd Street; North on 32nd Street to S Street; West on S Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to 34th Street; South on 34th Street to its intersection with a line extending S Street east from 35th Street; West along said line to 35th Street; South on 35th Street to Reservoir Road; West on Reservoir Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 35th Street and Volta Place; East on Volta Place to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to Q Street; East on Q Street to 31st Street; South on 31st Street to Dumbarton Street; West on Dumbarton Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Southeast on Wisconsin Avenue to Prospect Street; West on Prospect Street to 35th Street; North on 35th Street to N Street; West on N Street to 36th Street; North on 36th Street to O Street; West on O Street to 37th Street; North on 37th Street to P Street; East on P Street to 35th Street; North on 35th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 37th Street and Prospect Street; West on Prospect Street and continuing west along the southern border of Census Tract 2.01 to its intersection with the eastern border of Glover Archbold Park; North on said border of Glover Archbold Park to the Georgetown Medical Center service road just south of the New Research Building; East on said road to the Lombardi Cancer Center; Continuing east along the southern edge of the Lombardi Cancer Center to the Pasaquerella Health Center; South along the western edge of the Pasquerilla Health Center to the Leavey parking garage; East along the northern edge of the Leavey parking garage to the existing campus road immediately to the east of the garage. South on said road, passing west of Harbin Hall, to its intersection with a line extending O Street from the east; East on said line to its intersection with a line extending the western edge of the New North Building to the north; South along said line and continuing south along a line passing to the west of the New North building and pass between the Village C West buildings and the Village C East building, to an existing campus service road between the Village C East building to the north and the New South building to the south: In an easterly direction on said service road and an eastward extension of said service road passing to the north of the New South building, the Village A buildings and the Lauinger building to 37th Street; South on 37th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park and the southern border of Census Tract 2.01; East on said southern border of Census Tract 2.01 to Prospect Street; Continuing East on Prospect Street to a driveway 100 feet east of the curb at 36th Street; North along said driveway to a point 150 feet distant; East from said point to a point 130 feet distant; North from said point along the walkway between the Nevils Building and Loyola Hall to N Street; East on N Street to 35th Street; South on 35th Street to Prospect Street; East on Prospect Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to Dumbarton Street; East on Dumbarton Street to 31st Street; South on 31st Street to M Street; East on M Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of Rock Creek; Southwest along the centerline of Rock Creek to its mouth; Southwest from the center of the mouth of Rock Creek to the intersection of the Theodore Roosevelt Memorial Bridge and the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line at the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Northwest along the District of Columbia boundary line on the Virginia shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park south; North along said line to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 31st Street and Q Street; East on Q Street to 28th Street; South on 28th Street to P Street; East on P Street to its intersection with the centerline of Rock Creek; Southwest along the centerline of Rock Creek to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania to M Street; West on M Street to 31st Street; North on 31st Street to the point of beginning Q Street. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Wisconsin Avenue and Whitehaven Street; East on Whitehaven Street to the northwest boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park; Easterly along said northwest boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park to Whitehaven Street; East on Whitehaven Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of Rock Creek; Southeast along the centerline of Rock Creek to P Street; West on P Street to 28th Street; North on 28th Street to Q St; West on Q Street to 32nd Street; North on 32nd Street to S Street; West on S Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2E08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 37th Street and Prospect Street; North on 37th Street to its intersection with a line extending an existing campus service road between the Village C East building to the north and the New South building to the south; West along said line and said service road to its intersection with a line extending the western edge of the New North Building to the south; North along said line to its intersection with a line extending O Street from the east; West along said line extending O Street to its intersection with an existing campus road immediately to the west of Harbin Hall; North to a point equidistant from the Darnall Hall building and the westernmost Henle Village building; Northeast along a line equidistant from the Darnall Hall building and the Henle Village buildings until extending as far north as the northwest corner of the northernmost Henle Village building; East to the western property boundary of the Georgetown Visitation School; Counterclockwise around the property boundary of the Georgetown Visitation School to P Street; West on P Street to 37th Street; South on 37th Street to O Street; East on O Street to 36th Street; South on 36th Street to N Street; East on N Street to a walkway between the Nevils Building and Loyola Hall, 230 feet east of the curb at 36th Street; South along said walkway to a point 155 distant; West from said point to a point 130 feet distant along a driveway; South along said driveway to Prospect Street; West on Prospect Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 2F Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 15th and S Streets, N.W.; East on S Street, N.W. to 11th Street, N.W.; South on 11th Street, N.W. to P Street, N.W.; East on P Street, N.W. to 9th Street, N.W.; South on 9th Street, N.W. to N Street, N.W.; East on N Street, N.W. to the alley running along the eastern side of the Washington Convention Center; South along said alley to M Street, N.W.; East on M Street, N.W. to 7th Street, N.W.; South on 7th Street, N.W. to Mt Vernon Place, N.W.; West on Mt. Vernon Place, N.W. to Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. to 11th Street, N.W.; South on 11th Street, N.W. to I Street, N.W.; West on I Street, N.W. to the portion of 15th Street, N.W. that lies to the west of McPherson Square; North on 15th Street, N.W. to the point of beginning; [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F01 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 15th and S Streets, N.W.; East on S Street, N.W. to 11th Street, N.W.; South on 11th Street, N.W. to Vermont Avenue, N.W.; Southwest on Vermont Avenue, N.W. to Q Street, N.W.; West on Q Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F02 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 15th and Q Streets, N.W. East on Q Street, N.W. to 13th Street, N.W.; South on 13th Street to Logan Circle; Counterclockwise around Logan Circle to Rhode Island Avenue, N.W.; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue, N.W. to 15th Street, N.W.; North on 15th Street, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F03 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 15th Street and Rhode Island Avenue, N.W.; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue, N.W. to Logan Circle; Counterclockwise around Logan Circle to Vermont Avenue; Southwest on Vermont Ave NW to Thomas Circle; Counterclockwise around Thomas Circle to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F04 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of N Street, N.W. and Vermont Avenue, N.W. Northeast on Vermont Avenue to Logan Circle; Counterclockwise around Logan Circle to 13th Street, N.W.; North on 13th Street, N.W. to Q Street, N.W.; East on Q Street, N.W. to Vermont Avenue, N.W.; Northeast on Vermont Avenue, N.W. to 11th Street, N.W.; South on 11th Street, N.W. to P Street, N.W.; East on P Street, N.W. to 10th Street, N.W.; South on 10th Street, N. W. to N Street, N.W.; West on N Street, N.W. to the point of beginning; [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F05 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 15th Street, N.W. and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. to Thomas Circle; Clockwise around Thomas Circle to Vermont Avenue, N.W.; North on Vermont Avenue, N.W. to N Street, N.W.; East on N Street, N.W. to 13th Street, N.W.; South on 13th Street, N.W. to L Street, N.W.; West on L Street, N.W. to 14th Street, N.W.; South on 14th Street, N.W. to I Street, N.W.; West on I Street, N.W. to 15th Street, N.W.; North on 15th Street, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F06 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 10th Street, N.W. and P Street, N.W.; East on P Street, N.W. to 9th Street, N.W.; South on 9th Street, N.W. to N Street, N.W.; East on N Street, N.W. to the alley running along the eastern side of the Washington Convention Center; South along said alley to M Street, N.W.; East on M Street, N.W. to 7th Street, N.W.; South on 7th Street, N.W. to Mt Vernon Place; West on Mount Vernon Place to Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. to 11th Street, N.W.; North on 11th Street, N.W. to M Street, N.W.; East on M Street, N.W. to 10th Street, N.W.; North on 10th Street, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F07 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 13th and N Streets, N.W.; East on N Street, N.W. to 10th Street, N.W.; South on 10th Street, N.W. to M Street, N.W.; West on M Street, N.W. to 13th Street, N.W.; North on 13th Street, N. W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 2F08 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 13th and M Streets, N.W.; East on M Street, N.W. to 11th Street, N.W.; South on 11th Street, N.W. to I Street, N.W.; West on I Street, N.W. to 14th Street, N.W.; North on 14th Street, N. W. to L Street, N.W.; East on L Street, N.W. to 13th Street, N.W.; North on 13th Street, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 3B Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park and Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 39th Street; South on 39th Street to Garfield Street; East on Garfield Street to Wisconsin Avenue; South on Wisconsin Avenue to Calvert Street; East on Calvert Street to Observatory Circle—U.S. Naval Observatory property line; Counter-clockwise around said property line to its intersection with the northwest property boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park; South along said property boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park to Whitehaven Street; Southwest on Whitehaven Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to 35th Street; South on 35th Street to Whitehaven Parkway; West along Whitehaven Parkway to the Southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover-Archbold Park; West along said southern boundary of the eastern leg of Glover-Archbold Park to the point where it intersects the eastern boundary of Glover-Archbold Park; North along said eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park to its intersection with a line extending W Street from the west; West along said line extending W Street from the west to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Tunlaw Road and Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to 39th Street; Northwest on 39th Street to Edmunds Street; West on Edmunds Street to 42nd Street; Continuing west along a line extending Edmunds Street west to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to its intersection with New Mexico Avenue; Southeast on New Mexico Avenue to Tunlaw Road; East on Tunlaw Road to Fulton Street; Northeast on Fulton Street to Watson Place; Northeast on Watson Place to Garfield Street; East on Garfield Street to Wisconsin Avenue; South on Wisconsin Avenue to Fulton Street; West on Fulton Street to 39th Street; South on 39th Street and continuing south along a line extending 39th Street to Tunlaw Road; Southeast on Tunlaw Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Fulton Street and Wisconsin Avenue; South on Wisconsin Avenue to Calvert Street; East on Calvert Street to Observatory Circle—Naval Observatory property line; Counter-clockwise around said property line to its intersection with the northwest property boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park; South along said property boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park to Whitehaven Street; Southwest on Whitehaven Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to 35th Street; South on 35th Street to Whitehaven Parkway; West on Whitehaven Parkway to 37th Street; North on 37th Street to Tunlaw Road; Northwest on Tunlaw Road to its intersection with a line extending 39th Street from the north; North on said line extending 39th Street to 39th Street, and continuing north on 39th Street to Fulton Street; East on Fulton Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park and a line extending Edmunds Street from the east; East along said line extending Edmunds Street and continuing east on Edmunds Street to 39th Street; Southeast on 39th Street to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to 40th Street; South on 40th Street to W Street; West on W Street to its intersection with a line extending east from the portion of W Street west of Glover-Archbold Park; Continuing west on said line extending east from the portion of W Street west of Glover-Archbold Park, to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park and Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 39th Street; South on 39th Street to Watson Place; Southwest on Watson Place to Fulton Street; Southwest on Fulton Street to Tunlaw Road; West on Tunlaw Road to New Mexico Avenue; Northwest on New Mexico Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to the point of beginning; [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Calvert Street and Tunlaw Road; Southeast on Tunlaw Road to 37th Street; South on 37th Street to its intersection with the southern property line of Whitehaven Park; West along said southern boundary of Whitehaven Park to the eastern boundary of Glover-Archbold Park; North along said eastern boundary of Glover-Archbold Park to its intersection with a line extending east from the portion of W Street west of Glover-Archbold Park; East on said line extending W Street to its intersection with W Street, and continuing east on W Street to 40th Street; North on 40th Street to Calvert Street; East on Calvert Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 3C Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Van Ness Street and Wisconsin Avenue; Southeast on Wisconsin Avenue to Quebec Street; East on Quebec Street to Idaho Avenue; Northeast on Idaho Avenue to Rodman Street; Continuing northeast along a line extending Idaho Avenue to the rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street; East along said rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street to Reno Road; Southeast on Reno Road to the southwest corner of Melvin Hazen Park; East on the southern boundary of Melvin Hazen Park and continuing cast along the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Rodman Street; West on Rodman Street to the alley behind the properties fronting on the west side of Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on said alley to Porter Street; East on Porter Street to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to the northern property line of 3601 Connecticut Avenue; Northeast along said northern property line of 3601 Connecticut Avenue and continuing northeast along a line extending said property line to Melvin Hazen Creek; East on Melvin Hazen Creek to Rock Creek; Southerly on Rock Creek to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Whitehaven Street; West on Whitehaven Street to the northwestern boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park; West along said northwestern boundary of said Dumbarton Oaks Park to its intersection with the property boundary of the U.S. Naval Observatory; Clockwise around said property boundary of the U.S. Naval Observatory to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to Garfield Street; West on Garfield Street to 39th Street; North on 39th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to Van Ness Street; East on Van Ness Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Klingle Road and Rock Creek; Southerly on Rock Creek to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to Klingle Road; East on Klingle Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Garfield Street; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to Cleveland Avenue; Northwest on Cleveland Avenue to 31st Street; North on 31st Street to Garfield Street; East on Garfield Street to Woodley Road; Continuing east on Woodley Road to 27th Street; North on 27th Street to Garfield Street; East on Garfield Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Klingle Road; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Garfield Street; West on Garfield Street to 27th Street; South on 27th Street to Woodley Road; West on Woodley Road to 29th Street; North on 29th Street to Cortland Place; West on Cortland Place to Klingle Road; East on Klingle Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Rock Creek and Melvin Hazen Creek; Southerly on Rock Creek to Klingle Road; West on Klingle Road to its intersection with a line extending the eastern property line of 2710 Macomb Street to the south; North on said line extending the eastern property line of 2710 Macomb Street and continuing north on said property line to Macomb Street; West on Macomb Street to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to its intersection with the southern property boundary of Square 2222 Lot 805; East along said southern boundary of Square 2222 Lot 805 to its intersection with Porter Street; Northwest on Porter Street to Quebec Street; East on Quebec Street to the eastern property line of 3601 Connecticut Avenue; Counter-clockwise around the eastern property line of 3601 Connecticut Avenue to its northern-most point; East along a line extending the northern property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue east to Melvin Hazen Creek; East on Melvin Hazen Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Reno Road and Rodman Street; East on the southern boundary of Melvin Hazen Park and continuing east along the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Rodman Street; West on Rodman Street to the alley behind the properties fronting on the west side of Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on said alley to Porter Street; East on Porter Street to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to the northern property line of 3601 Connecticut Avenue; Clockwise around said property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue to Quebec Street; West on Quebec Street to Porter Street; Southeast on Porter Street to its intersection with the southern property boundary of Square 2222 Lot 805; West along said southern boundary of Square 2222 Lot 805 to its intersection with Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Newark Street; West on Newark Street to 34th Street; North on 34th Street to Ordway Street; West on Ordway Street to 36th Street; North on 36th Street to Porter Street; West on Porter Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to Quebec Street; East on Quebec Street to Idaho Avenue; Northeast on Idaho Avenue Rodman Street; Continuing northeast along a line extending Idaho Avenue to the rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street; East along said rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street to Reno Road; Southeast on Reno Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Van Ness Street and Wisconsin Avenue; Southeast on Wisconsin Avenue to Newark Street; West on Newark Street to Idaho Avenue; Southwest on Idaho Avenue to Macomb Street; West on Macomb Street to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to Van Ness Street; East on Van Ness Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Wisconsin Avenue and Newark Street; South on Wisconsin Avenue to Macomb Street; West on Macomb Street to the behind the properties fronting along the west side of Wisconsin Avenue; South on said alley to the southwest property corner of 3210 Wisconsin Avenue; East on the south property line of 3210 Wisconsin Avenue and continuing east along a line extending said property line east to Wisconsin Avenue; South on Wisconsin Avenue to Garfield Street; West on Garfield Street to 39th Street; North on 39th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Macomb Street; East on Macomb Street to Idaho Avenue; Northeast on Idaho Avenue to Newark Street; East on Newark Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Wisconsin Avenue and Woodley Road; East on Woodley Road to Klingle Road; East on Klingle Road to Cortland Place; East on Cortland Place to 29th Street; South on 29th Street to Garfield Street; West on Garfield Street to 31st Street; South on 31st Street to Cleveland Avenue; Southeast on Cleveland Avenue to Calvert Street; East on Calvert Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Rock Creek; Southerly on Rock Creek to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Whitehaven Street; West on Whitehaven Street to the northwestern boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park; West along said northwestern boundary of said Dumbarton Oaks Park to its intersection with the property boundary of the U.S. Naval Observatory; Clockwise around said property boundary of the U.S. Naval Observatory to Calvert Street; West on Calvert Street to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3C09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Wisconsin Avenue and Porter Street; East on Porter Street to 36 Street; South on 36th Street to Ordway Street; East on Ordway Street to 34th Street; South on 34th Street to Newark Street; East on Newark Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Macomb Street; East on Macomb Street to the eastern property line of 2710 Macomb Street; South on the eastern property line of 2710 Macomb Street and continuing south along a line extending said property line south to Klingle Road; West and southwest on Klingle Road to Woodley Road; West on Woodley Road to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to its intersection with a line extending the southern property boundary of 3210 Wisconsin Avenue to the east; West on said line extending the southern property boundary of 3210 Wisconsin Avenue and continuing west on said property line to the alley at the rear of said property; North on said alley to Macomb Street; East on Macomb Street to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 3D Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the southwest intersection of the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary and Westmoreland Circle; Southwest along the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary line to the Commonwealth of Virginia-District of Columbia boundary line on the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Southeast along the Commonwealth of Virginia-District of Columbia boundary line on the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park from the north; North along said line extending the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park and continuing north along the eastern boundary of Glover-Archbold Park to its intersection with a line extending W Street from the west; West along said line extending W Street to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to its intersection with Van Ness Street; West on Van Ness Street to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to its intersection with a line extending TindAll streets to the southeast; Northwest along said line extending TindAll streets to 44th Street; Southwest along 44th Street to the northeast property corner of 4412 Sedgewick Street; South along the property boundary of 4412 Sedgewick Street to its southeast corner; Northwest along the rear property boundaries of the lots fronting along the south side of Sedgewick Street to 45th Street; Southwest on 45th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Westmoreland Circle; Clockwise around Westmoreland Circle to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Foxhall Road and W Street; East on W Street and continuing east along a line extending W Street to the east through Glover-Archbold Park to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to New Mexico Avenue; Northwest on New Mexico Avenue to Klingle Street; West on Klingle Street to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to Macomb Street; East on Macomb Street to New Mexico Avenue; Northwest on New Mexico Avenue to its intersection with a line extending the northern property boundary of 3301 New Mexico Avenue to the west; East along said line extending the northern property boundary of 3301 New Mexico Avenue, and continuing east along a line extending said property boundary to the east to its intersection with the rear property boundary of 4100 Massachusetts Avenue; Northeast along said rear property line of 4100 Massachusetts Avenue to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to its intersection with southeastern boundary of the American University property identified as Square 1601 Lot 3; Southwest along said southeastern property boundary of Square 1601 Lot 3 to New Mexico Avenue; Northwest along New Mexico Avenue to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to Foxhall Road; Southwest from said intersection of Nebraska Avenue and Foxhall Road to the northernmost point of Battery Kemble Park; South along the western boundary of Battery Kemble Park to its intersection with a line extending the southern boundary of Wesley Heights Park from the east; East along said line extending the southern boundary of Wesley Heights Park to 49th Street; South on 49th Street to the southwest property corner of 4848 Dexter Street; East along the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting along Dexter Street to the northernmost property comer of 4526 Foxhall Crescent; South along the rear lines of the properties fronting along the west side of Foxhall Road to the southeast property corner of 4501 Foxhall Crescent; In an easterly direction to the northwest property corner of 2400 Foxhall Road; Continuing south along the rear property lines of the properties fronting along the west side of Foxhall Road to the southwest property corner of 2300 Foxhall Road; East along the rear property boundaries of properties fronting along the northern side of W Street to Foxhall Road; South on Foxhall Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at Massachusetts Avenue and Fordham Road; Southwest on Fordham Road to 49th Street; South on 49th Street to Glenbrook Road; West on Glenbrook Road to Loughboro Road; West on Loughboro Road to Macomb Street; Southwest on Macomb Street to Glenbrook Road; East on Glenbrook Road to Millwood Lane; East on Millwood Lane to Loughboro Road; East on Loughboro Road to Nebraska Avenue; Northeast on Nebraska Avenue to the American University service road northeast of Roper Hall; Northwest along said service road to Letts Hall; Southwest along a line equidistant from Letts Hall and Anderson Hall to its intersection with the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting on the north side of Rockwood Parkway; West along said rear property lines of the properties fronting along Rockwood Parkway to the southeast property corner of the American University property identified as Square 1600 Lot 816; Clockwise around said American University property identified as Square 1600 Lot 816 to its northeast corner; Clockwise around the boundary of the American University property identified as Square 1600 Lot 1 to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at Massachusetts Avenue and Fordham Road; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Westmoreland Circle; Clockwise around Westmoreland Circle to the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary; Southwest along the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary line to MacArthur Boulevard; South on MacArthur Boulevard to Little Falls Road; East on Little Falls Road to its end along the boundary of the Sibley Hospital property identified as Square 1448N Lot 806; Clockwise around the property boundary of said Sibley Hospital property to Dalecarlia Parkway; South on Dalcarlia Parkway to Loughboro Road; East on Loughboro Road to Palisade Lane South on Palisade Lane to Manning Place; East on Manning Place to Maud Street; South on Maude Street to Macomb Street; Southwest on Macomb Street to Klingle Street; East on Klingle Street to Arizona Avenue; Northeast on Arizona Avenue to Loughboro Road; West on Loughboro Road to Millwood Lane; West on Millwood Lane to Glenbrook Road; West on Glenbrook Road to Macomb Street; North on Macomb Street to Loughboro Road; East on Loughboro Road to Glenbrook Road; East on Glenbrook Road to 49th Street; North on 49th Street to Fordham Road; East on Fordham Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary and MacArthur Boulevard; South on MacArthur Boulevard to Little Falls Road; East on Little Falls Road to its end along the boundary of the Sibley Hospital property identified as Square 1448N Lot 806; Clockwise around the property boundary of said Sibley Hospital property to Dalecarlia Parkway; South on Dalecarlia Parkway to Loughboro Road; East on Loughboro Road to Palisade Lane; South on Palisade Lane to Manning Place; East on Manning Place to Maud Street; South on Maude Street to Macomb Street; Southwest on Macomb Street to Klingle Street; East on Klingle Street to Arizona Avenue; Southwest on Arizona Avenue to Canal Road; Continuing southwest along a line extending Arizona Avenue to the Commonwealth of Virginia—District of Columbia boundary on the Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Northwest along said Virginia shore of the Potomac River to the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Northeast along said State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at Loughboro Road and Arizona Avenue; Southwest on Arizona Avenue to Canal Road; Continuing southwest along a line extending Arizona Avenue to the Commonwealth of Virginia—District of Columbia boundary on the Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Southeast along said Virginia shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending Whitehaven Parkway from the northeast; Northeast along said line extending Whitehaven Parkway to the intersection of Whitehaven Parkway and MacArthur Boulevard; Northwest on MacArthur Boulevard to U Street; East on U Street to 48th Street; North on 48th Street to W Street; West on W Street to 49th Street; North on 49th Street to its intersection with a line extending the southern boundary of Wesley Heights Park to the west; West along said line extending the southern boundary of Wesley Heights Park west to the western boundary of Battery Kemble Park; North along the western boundary of Battery Kemble Park to its northernmost point; North from said northernmost point of Battery Kemble Park to the intersection of Nebraska Avenue and Foxhall Road; West on Nebraska Avenue to Loghboro Road; West on Loughboro Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park and the southern boundary of Whitehaven Park; West from said intersection of Glover-Archbold Park and Whitehaven Park along a line connecting to the intersection of Whitehaven Parkway and Foxhall Road; Southeast on Foxhall Road to Salem Lane; West on Salem Lane to 45th Street; Southeast on 45th Street to Q Street; Southwest on Q Street to MacArthur Boulevard; Northwest on MacArthur Boulevard to U Street; East on U Street to 48th Street; North on 48th Street to W Street; West on W Street to 49th Street; North on 49th Street to the southwest property corner of 4848 Dexter Street; East along the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting along Dexter Street to the northernmost property corner of 4526 Foxhall Crescent; South along the rear lines of the properties fronting along the west side of Foxhall Road to the southeast property comer of 4501 Foxhall Crescent; In an easterly direction to the northwest property corner of 2400 Foxhall Road; Continuing south along the rear property lines of the properties fronting along the west side of Foxhall Road to the southwest property comer of 2300 Foxhall Road; East along the rear property boundaries of properties fronting along the northern side of W Street to Foxhall Road; South on Foxhall Road to W Street; East on W Street and continuing east along a line extending W Street to the east across Glover-Archbold Park to the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park; South along the eastern boundary of Glover Archbold Park to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New Mexico Avenue and Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to the American University service road northeast of Roper Hall; Northwest along said service road to Letts Hall; Southwest along a line equidistant from Letts Hall and Anderson Hall to its intersection with the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting on the north side of Rockwood Parkway; West along said rear property lines of the properties fronting along Rockwood Parkway to the southeast property corner of the American University property identified as Square 1600 Lot 816; Clockwise around said American University property identified as Square 1600 Lot 816 to its northeast corner; Clockwise around the boundary of the American University property identified as Square 1600 Lot 1 to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to Ward Circle and continuing southeast on a line extending Massachusetts Avenue across Ward Circle; Continuing southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to its intersection with the southeastern boundary of the American University property identified as Square 1601 Lot 3; Southwest along said southeastern property boundary of Square 1601 Lot 3 to New Mexico Avenue; Northwest along New Mexico Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New Mexico Avenue and a line extending the northern property boundary of 3301 New Mexico Avenue to the west; East along said line extending the northern property boundary of 3301 New Mexico Avenue, and continuing east along a line extending said property boundary to the east to its intersection with the rear property boundary of 4100 Massachusetts Avenue Counterclockwise around said rear property line of 4100 Massachusetts Avenue to the southeast property corner; East along a line extending east from said southeast property corner to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold park; South along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to New Mexico Avenue; Northeast on New Mexico Avenue to Klingle Street; West on Klingle Street to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to Macomb Street; East on Macomb Street to New Mexico Avenue; North on New Mexico Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Whitehaven Parkway and Foxhall Road; East from said intersection along a line connecting to the intersection of the eastern boundary of Glover-Archibold Park and the southern boundary of Whitehaven Park; Southeast on the eastern boundary of Glover-Archibold Park, extending said boundary along a line south to the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; Northwest along said Commonwealth of Virginia-District of Columbia boundary line where it follows the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River to its intersections with a line extending Whitehaven Parkway from the northeast; Northeast along said line extending Whitehaven Parkway to the intersection of Whitehaven Parkway and MacArthur Boulevard; Southeast on MacArthur to Q Street; Northeast on Q Street to 45th Street; North on 45th Street to Salem Lane; East on Salem Lane to Foxhall Road; North on Foxhall Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3D10 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Nebraska Avenue and Van Ness Street; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to its intersection with a line extending TindAll streets to the southeast; Northwest along said line extending TindAll streets to 44th Street; Southwest along 44th Street to the northeast property corner of 4412 Sedgewick Street; South along the property boundary of 4412 Sedgewick Street to its southeast corner; Northwest along the rear property boundaries of the lots fronting along the south side of Sedgewick Street to 45th Street; Southwest on 45th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to Ward Circle and continuing southeast on a line extending Massachusetts Avenue across Ward Circle; Continuing southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to the northwest property corner of 4100 Massachusetts Avenue; Counterclockwise around the rear property line of 4100 Massachusetts Avenue to the southeast property corner; East along a line extending east from said southeast property corner to its intersection with the centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way within Glover-Archbold Park; North along said centerline of the former Arizona Avenue right of way to Van Ness Street; West on Van Ness Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 3E Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 41st Street and the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; South on 41st Street to Reno Road; Southeast on Reno Road to Chesapeake Street; West on Chesapeake Street to 38th Street; South on 38th Street to Warren Street; West on Warren Street to 39th Street; South on 39th Street to Van Ness Street; West on Van Ness Street to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to its intersection with a line extending TindAll streets to the southeast; Northwest along said line extending TindAll streets to 44th Street; Southwest along 44th Street to the northeast property corner of 4412 Sedgewick Street; South along the property boundary of 4412 Sedgewick Street to its southeast corner; Northwest along the rear property boundaries of the lots fronting along the south side of Sedgewick Street to 45th Street; Southwest on 45th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Westmoreland Circle; Clockwise around Westmoreland Circle to the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Northeast along the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3E01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 41st Street and Chesapeake Street; East on Chesapeake Street to 38th Street; South on 38th Street to Alton Place; West on Alton Place to Nebraska Avenue; Southeast on Nebraska Avenue on Tenley Circle; Counterclockwise around Tenley Circle to Yuma Street; West on Yuma Street to 44th Street; South on 44th to Windom Place; West on Windom Place to 47th Street; North on 47th Street to Albemarle Street; East on Albemarle Street to 46th Street; North on 46th Street to Burlington Place; East on Burlington Place to 44th Street; South on 44th Street to Brandywine Street; East on Brandywine Street to 41st Street; North on 41st Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3E02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Western Avenue and Fessenden Street; East on Fessenden Street to 45th Street; South on 45th Street to Burlington Place; West on Burlington Place to 46th Street; South on 46th Street to Albemarle Street; West on Albemarle Street to 47th Street; South on 47th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Westmoreland Circle; Clockwise around Westmoreland Circle to the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Northeast along the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3E03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Wisconsin Avenue and the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Southeast on Wisconsin Avenue to Garrison Street; East on Garrison Street to 42nd Street; South on 42nd Street to Fessenden Street; East on Fessenden Street to 41st Street; South on 41st Street to Ellicott Street; East on Ellicott Street to Belt Road; Southwest on Belt Road to 41st Street South on 41st Street to Brandywine Street; West on Brandywine to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to Burlington Place; West on Burlington Place to 45th Street; North on 45th Street to Fessenden Street; West on Fessenden Street to the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Northeast on the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3E04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary and 41st Street; South on 41st Street to Reno Road; Southeast on Reno Road to Chesapeake Street; West on Chesapeake Street to 41st Street; North on 41st Street to Belt Road; Northeast on Belt Road to Ellicott Street; West on Ellicott Street to 41st Street; North on 41st Street to Fessenden Street; West on Fessenden Street to 42nd Street; North on 42nd Street to Garrison Street; West on Garrison Street to Wisconsin Avenue; Northwest on Wisconsin Avenue to the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Northeast along the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3E05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 44th Street and Yuma Street; East on Yuma Street to Tenley Circle; Clockwise around Tenley Circle to Nebraska Avenue; Northeast on Nebraska Avenue to Alton Place; East on Alton Place to 38th Street; South on 38th Street to Warren Street; West on Warren Street to 39th Street; South on 39th Street to Van Ness Street; West on Van Ness Street to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to its intersection with a line extending TindAll streets to the southeast; Northwest along said line extending TindAll streets to 44th Street; Southwest along 44th Street to the northeast property corner of 4412 Sedgewick Street; South along the property boundary of 4412 Sedgewick Street to its southeast corner; Northwest along the rear property boundaries of the lots fronting along the south side of Sedgewick Street to 45th Street; Southwest on 45th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to 47th Street; North on 47th Street to Windom Place; East on Windom Place to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 3F Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Nebraska Avenue and Nevada Avenue; Southeast on Nevada Avenue to Broad Branch Road; Southeast on Broad Branch Road to 27th Street; North on 27th Street to Military Road; East on Military Road to Rock Creek; South along Rock Creek to Melvin Hazen Creek; West along Melvin Hazen Creek to its intersection with a line extending the shared property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue and 3701 Connecticut Avenue to the northeast; Southwest along said line extending the shared property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue and 3701 Connecticut Avenue, and continuing southwest along said shared property boundary to Connecticut Avenue; South on Connecticut Avenue to Porter Street; West on Porter Street to the alley behind the properties fronting on the west side of Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on said alley to Rodman Street; East on Rodman Street to Connecticut Avenue; North on Connecticut Avenue to the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street; West along said rear property boundaries and continuing west along the southern boundary of Melvin Hazen Park to Reno Road; North on Reno Road to the rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street; West along said rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street to the intersection with a line extending Idaho Avenue from the southwest; Southwest along said line extending Idaho Avenue to Idaho Avenue; Continuing southwest on Idaho Avenue to Quebec Street; West on Quebec Street to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to 39th Street; North on 39th Street to Warren Street; East on Warren Street to 38th Street; North on 38th Street to Chesapeake Street; East on Chesapeake Street to Reno Road; North on Reno Road to Nebraska Avenue; Northeast on Nebraska Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3F01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Reno Road and Yuma Street; East on Yuma Street to Connecticut Avenue; South on Connecticut Avenue to the rear property boundaries of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street; West along said rear property boundaries and continuing west along the southern boundary of Melvin Hazen Park to Reno Road; North on Reno Road to the rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street; West along said rear property lines of the properties fronting on the north side of Rodman Street to the intersection with a line extending Idaho Avenue from the southwest; Southwest along said line extending Idaho Avenue to Idaho Avenue; Continuing southwest on Idaho Avenue to Quebec Street; West on Quebec Street to Wisconsin Avenue; North on Wisconsin Avenue to 39th Street; North on 39th Street to Warren Street; East on Warren Street to 38th Street; North on 38th Street to Windom Place; East on Windom Place to Reno Road; North on Reno Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3F02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Windom Place; East on Windom Place to its end along the southern boundary of Soapstone Valley Park; Continuing East along said southern boundary of Soapstone Valley Park to the northeast property corner of the Howard University property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810; South along the eastern boundary of said property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810 to its intersection with the northwest corner of the Levine School of Music property identified as Square 2049 Lot 809; Clockwise around the boundary of said property identified as Square 2049 Lot 809 to its intersection with the southeast corner of the previously referenced Howard University property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810; Clockwise around the boundary of said property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810 to its intersection with Van Ness Street; West on Van Ness Street to Connecticut Avenue; North on Connecticut Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3F03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Linnean Avenue and Broad Branch Road; East along Broad Branch Road to 27th Street; North on 27th Street to Military Road; East on Military Road to Rock Creek; South along Rock Creek to Broad Branch; North along Broad Branch to Soapstone Creek; West along Soapstone Creek to the easternmost extent of Soapstone Valley Park; Clockwise around the boundary of Soapstone Valley Park to Albemarle Street; East on Albemarle Street to 32nd Street; North on 32nd Street to Appleton Street; East on Appleton Street to 31st Street; North on 31st Street to Gates Road; West on Gates Road to Chesapeake Street; West on Chesapeake Street to 32nd Street; North on 32nd Street to Davenport Street; West on Davenport Street to Connecticut Avenue; North on Connecticut Avenue to Ellicott Avenue; East on Ellicott Avenue to the southeast corner of Census Block 13.01 3001; North along the eastern boundary of said Census Block 13.01 3001 to Fessenden Street East on Fessenden Street to Broad Branch Terrace; North on Broad Branch Terrace to 33rd Street; Northeast on 33rd Street to Linnean Avenue; North on Linnean Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3F04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Davenport Street; East on Davenport Street to 32nd Street; South on 32nd Street to Chesapeake Street; East on Chesapeake Street to Gates Road; East on Gates Road to 31st Street; South on 31st Street to Appleton Street, West on Appleton Street to 32nd Street; South on 32nd Street to Albemarle Street; West on Albemarle Street to the intersection of Albemarle Street and the northwest corner of Soapstone Valley Park; South along the border of said Soapstone Valley Park to Windom Place; West along Windom Place to Connecticut Avenue; North on Connecticut Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description SMD 3F05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Nebraska Avenue and Nevada Avenue; Southeast on Nevada Avenue to Linnean Avenue; South on Linnean Avenue to 33rd Street; Southwest on 33rd Street to Broad Branch Terrace; South on Broad Branch Terrace to Fessenden Street; West on Fessenden Street to the northeast corner of Census Block 13.01 3001; South along the eastern boundary of said Census Block 13.01 3001 to Ellicott Street; West on Ellicott Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Brandywine Street; West on Brandywine Street to 36th Street; North on 36th Street to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to Nebraska Avenue; and Northeast on Nebraska Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3F06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Nebraska Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to 36th Street; South on 36th Street to Brandywine Street; East on Brandywine Street to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Yuma Street; West on Yuma Street to Reno Road; South on Reno Road to Windom Place; West on Windom Place to 38th Street; North on 38th Street to Chesapeake Street; East on Chesapeake Street to Reno Road; North on Reno Road to Nebraska Avenue; North on Nebraska Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3F07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Connecticut Avenue and Van Ness Street; East on Van Ness Street to its end at the boundary of the Howard University property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810; Counter-clockwise around the boundary of said property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810 to its intersection with the southwest corner of the Levine School of Music property identified as Square 2049 Lot 809; Counter-clockwise around the boundary of said property identified as Square 2049 Lot 809 to its northwest corner at its intersection with the eastern property boundary of the previously referenced Howard University property identified as Square 2049 Lot 810; North along said eastern property boundary of Square 2049 Lot 810 to its northeast corner at its intersection with the southern boundary of Soapstone Valley Park; East along said southern boundary of Soapstone Valley Park to the easternmost extent of the Park; North along the eastern boundary of Soapstone Valley Park to Soapstone Creek; East along Soapstone Creek to Broad Branch; South along Broad Branch to Rock Creek; South along Rock Creek to Melvin C. Hazen Creek; West along said Melvin Hazen Creek to its intersection with a line extending the northern property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue to the northeast; Southwest along said line extending the northern property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue, and continuing southwest along said northern property boundary of 3601 Connecticut Avenue to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Porter Street; West on Porter Street to the alley behind the properties fronting on the west side of Connecticut Avenue; Northwest along said alley to Rodman Street; East on Rodman Street to Connecticut Avenue; North on Connecticut Avenue the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 3G Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Rock Creek; Southeast along Rock Creek to its intersection with Military Road. West on Military Road to 27th Street; South on 27th Street to Broad Branch Road. West on Broad Branch Road to Nevada Avenue; Continuing west on Nevada Avenue to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to Reno Road; Northwest on Reno Road to its intersection with the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Northeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Rock Creek; Southeast along Rock Creek to its intersection with a line extending Beech Street from the west West along said line extending Beech Street and continuing west on Beech Street to a line extending Barnaby Street from the southwest; Southwest along said line extending Barnaby Street to Aberfoyle Place; East on Aberfoyle Place to 31st Street; Southwest on 31st Street to Tennyson Street; West on Tennyson Street to 33rd Street; North on 33rd Street to Upland Terrace; West on Upland Terrace to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Northeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Beech Street and a line extending Barnaby Street from the southwest; East on Beech Street and continuing east along a line extending Beech Street east to Rock Creek; South along Rock Creek to Military Road. West on Military Road to 27th Street; North on 27th Street to Utah Avenue. Northwest on Utah Avenue to Tennyson Street; East on Tennyson Street to 31st Street. Northeast on 31st Street to Aberfoyle Place; Northwest on Aberfoyle Place to Barnaby Street. Northeast along a line extending Barnaby Street to the northeast to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Utah Avenue and Nebraska Avenue; Southeast on Utah Avenue to 27th Street; South on 27th Street to Broad Branch Road.; West on Broad Branch Road to Nevada Avenue; Northwest on Nevada Avenue to Legation Street; East on Legation Street to Broad Branch Road; Northwest on Broad Branch Road to Morrison Street; East on Morrison Street to Nebraska Avenue; Northeast on Nebraska Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Upland Terrace; East on Upland Terrace to 33rd Street; South on 33rd Street to Tennyson Street; East on Tennyson Street to Utah Avenue. Southeast on Utah Avenue to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to Morrison Street; West on Morrison Street to Broad Branch Road; Northwest on Broad Branch Road to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary. Northeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary and Broad Branch Road; Southeast on Broad Branch Road to Legation Street; West on Legation Street to Nevada Avenue; Southeast on Nevada Avenue to Jocelyn Street; West on Jocelyn Street to Chevy Chase Parkway; North on Chevy Chase Parkway to Legation Street; West on Legation Street to Connecticut Avenue; Northwest on Connecticut Avenue to Chevy Chase Circle; Counterclockwise around Chevy Chase Circle to the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary; Northeast along the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the northeast intersection of Chevy Chase Circle and the State of Maryland—District of Columbia boundary; Clockwise around Chevy Chase Circle to Connecticut Avenue; Southeast on Connecticut Avenue to Legation Street; East on Legation Street to Chevy Chase Parkway; South on Chevy Chase Parkway to Kanawha Street; West on Kanawha Street to 38th Street; North on 38th Street to Military Road; West on Military Road to Reno Road; Northwest on Reno Road to 41st Street; North on 41st Street to the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary; Northeast along the State of Maryland-District of Columbia boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 3G07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Military Road and Reno Road; East on Military Road to 38th Street; South on 38th Street to Kanawha Street; East on Kanawha Street to Chevy Chase Parkway; South on Chevy Chase Parkway to Jocelyn Street; East on Jocelyn Street to Nevada Avenue; Southeast on Nevada Avenue to Nebraska Avenue; Southwest on Nebraska Avenue to Reno Road; Northwest on Reno Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC4A Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Rock Creek; Northeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the northern tip of the District of Columbia; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Missouri Avenue; West on Missouri Avenue to Colorado Avenue; Southwest on Colorado Avenue to Kennedy Street; West on Kennedy Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Piney Branch Parkway; Southwest on Piney Branch Parkway to Beach Drive; Continuing southwest along a line extending Piney Branch Parkway southwest to Rock Creek; North along Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary line and Rock Creek; Southeast on Rock Creek to Sherrill Drive; East on Sherrill Drive to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Alaska Avenue; Northeast on Alaska Avenue to Geranium Street; West on Geranium Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Northgate Road; Northeast on Northgate Road to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Northwest on the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the northern tip of the District of Columbia; Southwest on the District of Columbia-State of Maryland boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Northgate Road; Southwest on Northgate Road to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Geranium Street; East on Geranium Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Northwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alaska Avenue and Geranium Street; Southwest on Alaska Avenue to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Underwood Street; East on Underwood Street to Luzon Avenue; Northeast on Luzon Avenue to Van Buren Street; East on Van Buren Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Geranium Street; West on Geranium Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Luzon Avenue and Van Buren Street; Southwest on Luzon Avenue to Somerset Place; East on Somerset Place to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Rittenhouse Street; East on Rittenhouse Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Rittenhouse Street; East on Rittenhouse Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Van Buren Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Somerset Place; South on 16th Street to Fort Stevens Drive; East on Fort Stevens Drive to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Peabody Street; East on Peabody Street to 13th Place; North on 13th Place to Fort Stevens Drive; East on Fort Stevens Drive to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to the portion of Rittenhouse Street west of 13th Street; West on Rittenhouse Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Somerset Place; West on Somerset Place to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street and Peabody Street; East on Peabody Street to 13th Place; North on 13th Place to Fort Stevens Drive; East on Fort Stevens Drive to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Rittenhouse Street; East on Rittenhouse Street to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Missouri Avenue; West on Missouri Avenue to Colorado Avenue; Southwest on Colorado Avenue to Madison Street; West on Madison Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Rock Creek and a line extending Joyce Road from the northeast; Northeast along said line extending Joyce Road to Joyce Road; Continuing Northeast on Joyce Road to Morrow Drive; Southeast on Morrow Drive to Kennedy Street; East on Kennedy Street to Colorado Avenue; Northeast on Colorado Avenue to Madison Street; West on Madison Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Fort Stevens Drive; West on Fort Stevens Drive to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Luzon Avenue; Northeast on Luzon Avenue to Underwood Street; West on Underwood Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Sherrill Drive; West on Sherrill Drive to Rock Creek; South on Rock Creek to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4A08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Rock Creek and a line extending Joyce Road from the northeast; South on Rock Creek to a line extending Piney Branch Parkway from the northeast; East on said line extending Piney Branch Parkway to Piney Branch Parkway, and continuing northeast on Piney Branch Parkway to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Morrow Drive; Northwest on Morrow Drive to Joyce Road; Southwest on Joyce Road, and continuing southwest along a line extending Joyce Road southwest to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 4B Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Georgia Avenue, N.W.; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Kennedy Street, N.E.; West on Kennedy Street, N.E. to South Dakota Avenue, N.E.; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue, N.E. to Riggs Road, N.E.; Southwest on Riggs Road, N.E. to Missouri Avenue, N.W.; Northwest on Missouri Avenue, N.W. to Longfellow Street, N.W.; West on Longfellow Street, N.W. to Shepherd Road, N.W.; Northwest on Shepherd Road, N.W. to 7th Street, N.W.; South on 7th Street, N.W. to Longfellow Street, N.W.; West on Longfellow Street, N.W. to Georgia Avenue, N.W.; North on Georgia Avenue, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Cedar Street; South and then west on Cedar Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to Butternut Street; West on Butternut Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to Highland Avenue; West on Highland Avenue to 9th; North on 9th Street to Elder Street; West on Elder Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Elder Street; East on Elder Street to 9th Street; South on 9th Street to Highland Avenue; East on Highland Avenue to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to Butternut Street; East on Butternut Street to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to Cedar Street; East on Cedar Street to the centerline of the WMATA right of way; Southeast along said centerline of the WMATA right of way to Aspen Street; West on Aspen Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Van Buren Street; West on Van Buren Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Van Buren Street; East on Van Buren Street to 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to Rittenhouse Street; West on Rittenhouse Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to Roxboro Place; West on Roxboro Place to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to Sheridan Street; West on Sheridan Street to 9th Street; South on 9th Street to Rittenhouse Street; West on Rittenhouse Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Rittenhouse Street; East on Rittenhouse Street to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to Sheridan Street; East on Sheridan Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to Roxboro Place; East on Roxboro Place to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to Rittenhouse Street; East on Rittenhouse Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Oglethorpe Street; West on Oglethorpe Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Nicholson Street; West on Nicholson Street to Missouri Avenue; Northwest on Missouri Avenue to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Missouri Avenue; Southeast on Missouri Avenue to Nicholson Street; East on Nicholson Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to Oglethorpe Street; East on Oglethorpe Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Longfellow Street; West on Longfellow Street to Shepherd Road; Northwest on Shepherd Road to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to Longfellow Street; West on Longfellow Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 3rd Street and Van Buren Street; East on Van Buren Street to the centerline of the WMATA right of way; Southeast along said centerline of the WMATA right of way to New Hampshire Avenue, N.E.; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue, N.E., to McDonald Place, N.E.; West on McDonald Place, N.E. to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Milmarson Place; West on Milmarson Place to 1st Street; South on 1st Street to Longfellow Street; West on Longfellow Street to 2nd Street; South on 2nd Street to Missouri Avenue; Northwest on Missouri Avenue to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Rittenhouse Street; East on Rittenhouse Street to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and Cedar Street; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to New Hampshire Avenue, NE; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue, N.E. to the centerline of the WMATA right of way; Northwest along said centerline of the WMATA right of way to Van Buren Street; West on Van Buren Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Aspen Street; East on Aspen Street to the centerline of the WMATA right of way; Northwest along said centerline of the WMATA right of way to Cedar Street; East and then north on Cedar Street to the point of beginning . [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B08 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and New Hampshire Avenue, N.E.; Southeast along said District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to 6th Street, N.E.: South on 6th Street, N.E. to Oglethorpe Street, N.E.; West on Oglethorpe Street, N.E. to 3rd Street, N.E.; South on 3rd Street, N.E. to Riggs Road, N.E.; Southwest on Riggs Road, N.E. to Missouri Avenue (at North Capitol Street); Northwest on Missouri Avenue, N.W. to 2nd Street, N.W.; North on 2nd Street, N.W. to Longfellow Street, N.W.; East on Longfellow Street, N.W. to 1st Street, N.W.; North on 1st Street, N.W. to Milmarson Place, NW; East on Milmarson Place, N.W. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to MacDonald Place, N.E.; East on McDonald Place, NE to New Hampshire Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue, N.E. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4B09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary and 6th Street; Southeast along said District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Kennedy Street; West on Kennedy Street to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to Oglethorpe Street; East on Oglethorpe Street to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 4C Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Missouri Avenue and Georgia Avenue; Northwest on Missouri Avenue to Colorado Avenue; Southwest on Colorado Avenue to Kennedy Street; West on Kennedy Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Spring Road; Southeast on Spring Road to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Rock Creek Church Road; Northeast on Rock Creek Church Road to its intersection with Webster Street along the property boundary of the Rock Creek Parish Cemetery property identified as Parcel 01110037; Clockwise around said property boundary of Parcel 01110037 to its intersection with Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Delafield Place; West on Delafield Place to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to Kansas Avenue; Southwest on Kansas Avenue to Sherman Circle; Clockwise around Sherman Circle to its southeast intersection with Illinois Avenue; Southeast on Illinois Avenue to Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Missouri Avenue and Georgia Avenue; Northwest on Missouri Avenue to Colorado Avenue; Southwest on Colorado Avenue to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Ingraham Street; East on Ingraham Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Hamilton Street; East on Hamilton Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Kennedy Street and 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Crittenden Street; East on Crittenden Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Buchanan Street; East on Buchanan Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Decatur Street; East on Decatur Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Hamilton Street; West on Hamilton Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Ingraham Street; West on Ingraham Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Kennedy Street; West on Kennedy Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Crittenden Street; South on 16th Street to Upshur Street; East on Upshur Street to Arkansas Avenue; Northeast on Arkansas Avenue to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Allison Street; East on Allison Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Crittenden Street; West on Crittenden Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Upshur Street; South on 16th Street to Spring Road; East on Spring Road to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Upshur Street; West on Upshur Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street and Allison Street; South on 14th Street to Arkansas Avenue; Southwest on Arkansas Avenue to Upshur Street; East on Upshur Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Spring Road; Southeast on Spring Road to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Taylor Street; East on Taylor Street to Kansas Avenue; Northeast on Kansas Avenue to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Iowa Avenue; Northwest on Iowa Avenue to Allison Street; West on Allison Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 13th Street and Taylor Street; South on 13th Street to Spring Road; Southeast on Spring Road to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Shepherd Street; West on Shepherd Street to Kansas Avenue; Northeast on Kansas Avenue to Taylor Street; West on Taylor Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Buchanan Street; South on Georgia Avenue to Allison Street; West on Allison Street to Iowa Avenue; Southeast on Iowa Avenue to Georgia Avenue; South on Georgia Avenue to Kansas Avenue; Southwest on Kansas Avenue to Shepherd Street; East on Shepherd Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to Upshur Street; East on Upshur Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to Grant Circle; Clockwise around Grant Circle to its northeast intersection with New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Allison Street; West on Allison Street to Illinois Avenue; Northwest on Illinois Avenue to Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Shepherd Street; South on Georgia Avenue to Rock Creek Church Road; East on Rock Creek Church Road to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to Upshur Street; West on Upshur Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to Shepherd Street; West on Shepherd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the southeast intersection of Sherman Circle and Illinois Avenue; Southeast on Illinois Avenue to Allison Street; East on Allison Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Southwest on New Hampshire Avenue to Grant Circle; Counter-clockwise around Grant Circle to its southeast intersection with Illinois Avenue; Southeast on Illinois Avenue to Upshur Street; East on Upshur Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Webster Street; East on Webster Street to its intersection with Rock Creek Church Road along the property boundary of the Rock Creek Parish Cemetery property identified as Parcel 01110037; Clockwise around said property boundary of Parcel 01110037 to its intersection with Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Delafield Place; West on Delafield Place to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to Kansas Avenue; Southwest on Kansas Avenue to Sherman Circle; Clockwise around Sherman Circle to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4C10 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the southern intersection of Grant Circle and 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Rock Creek Church Road; Northeast on Rock Creek Church Road to Webster Street; West on Webster Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Upshur Street; West on Upshur Street to Illinois Avenue; Northwest on Illinois Avenue to Grant Circle; Clockwise around Grant Circle to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 4D Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Longfellow Street; East on Longfellow Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to Shepherd Road; East on Shepherd Road to Longfellow Street; East on Longfellow Street to Missouri Avenue; Southeast on Missouri Avenue to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Rock Creek Church Road; Southwest on Rock Creek Church Road to its intersection with Webster Street along the property boundary of the Rock Creek Parish Cemetery property identified as Parcel 01110037; Clockwise around said property boundary of Parcel 01110037 to its intersection with Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Delafield Place; West on Delafield Place to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to Kansas Avenue; Southwest on Kansas Avenue to Sherman Circle; Clockwise around Sherman Circle to its southeast intersection with Illinois Avenue; Southeast on Illinois Avenue to Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Georgia Avenue and Longfellow Street; East on Longfellow Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to Shepherd Road; East on Shepherd Road to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Jefferson Street; West on Jefferson Street to 9th Street; South on 9th Street to Ingraham Street; West on Ingraham Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4D02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Shepherd Road and 5th Street; East on Shepherd Road to Longfellow Street; East on Longfellow Street to Missouri Avenue; Southeast on Missouri Avenue to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Ingraham Street; West on Ingraham Street to New Hampshire Avenue; South on New Hampshire Avenue to Gallatin Street; West on Gallatin Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Jefferson Street; West on Jefferson Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 4th Street and Gallatin Street; North on 4th Street to Jefferson Street; West on Jefferson Street to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to Farragut Street; East on Farragut Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Delafield Place; East on Delafield Place to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Farragut Street; East on Farragut Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to Gallatin Street; West on Gallatin Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 9th Street and Jefferson Street; East on Jefferson Street to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to Emerson Street; West on Emerson Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Ingraham Street; East on Ingraham Street to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of North Capitol Street and Ingraham Street; South on North Capitol Street to Rock Creek Church Road; Southwest on Rock Creek Church Road to its intersection with Webster Street along the property boundary of the Rock Creek Parish Cemetery property identified as Parcel 01110037; Clockwise around said property boundary of Parcel 01110037 to its intersection with Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Farragut Street; East on Farragut Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to Gallatin Street; East on Gallatin Street to New Hampshire Avenue; Northeast on New Hampshire Avenue to Ingraham Street; East on Ingraham Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 4D06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Buchanan Street and Illinois Avenue; West on Buchanan Street to Georgia Avenue; North on Georgia Avenue to Emerson Street; East on Emerson Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to Farragut Street; East on Farragut Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Decatur Street; West on Decatur Street to Kansas Avenue; Southwest on Kansas Avenue to Sherman Circle; Clockwise around Sherman Circle to its southeast intersection with Illinois Avenue; Southeast on Illinois Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 5A Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of North Capitol Street and Riggs Road; East on Riggs Road, N.E. to South Dakota Avenue, N.E.; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue, N.E. to Kennedy Street, N.E.; East on Kennedy Street, N.E. to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to its intersection with a line extending 16th Street, N.E. from the southwest; Southwest along said line extending 16th Street, N.E. to 16th Street, N.E.; South on 16th Street, N.E. to Buchannan Street, N.E.; East on Buchannan Street, N.E. to 17th Street, N.E.; South on 17th Street, N.E. to Webster Street, N.E.; West on Webster Street, N.E. to South Dakota Avenue, N.E.; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue, N.E. to Michigan Avenue, N.E.; West on Michigan Avenue, N.E. to 14th Street, N.E.; North on 14th Street, N.E. to Varnum Street, N.E.; West on Varnum Street, N.E. to 10th Street, N.E.; South on 10th Street, N.E. to Taylor Street, N.E.; West on Taylor Street, N.E. to the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; South along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Michigan Avenue, N.E.; Southwest on Michigan Avenue, N.E. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to Irving Street; West on Irving Street, N.W. to Kenyon Street, N.W.; West on Kenyon Street, N.W. to Park Place, N.W.; North on Park Place, N.W. to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; Northeast on Rock Creek Church Road, N.W. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and Kennedy Street; East on Kennedy Street to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Galloway Street; West on Galloway Street to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and Galloway Street; East on Galloway Street to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to its intersection with a line extending 16th Street from the southwest; Southwest along said line extending 16th Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Buchannan Street; East on Buchannan Street to 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Webster Street; West on Webster Street to South Dakota Avenue; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and 8th Street; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to Michigan Avenue; West on Michigan Avenue to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to Varnum Street; West on Varnum Street to 10th Street; South on 10th Street to Taylor Street; West on Taylor Street to the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; North along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to its intersection with a line extending Buchanan Street from the east; East along said line extending Buchanan Street to Buchanan Street, and continuing east on Buchanan Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Fort Totten Drive and Bates Road; Northeast on Bates Road to its northernmost extent; Continuing northeast along a line extending Bates Road northeast to its intersection with the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; South along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Michigan Avenue; Southwest on Michigan Avenue to Irving Street; Northwest on Irving Street to the access ramp to North Capitol Street northbound; Northwest on said access ramp to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to Scale Gate Road; East on Scale Gate Road to Harewood Road; North on Harewood Road to Taylor Street; East on Taylor Street to Hawaii Avenue; Northwest on Hawaii Avenue to Fort Totten Drive; Northwest on Fort Totten Drive to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A05 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Rock Creek Church Road, N.W. and Harewood Road, N.W.; Southwest on Rock Creek Church Road, N.W. to Park Place, N.W.; South on Park Place, N.W. to Kenyon Street, N.W.; East on Kenyon Street, N.W. to Irving Street, N.W.; East on Irving Street, N.W. to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Michigan Avenue; East on Michigan Avenue, N.E. to Irving Street, N.E.; Northwest on Irving Street, N.E. to the access ramp to North Capitol Street northbound; Northwest on said access ramp to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to Harewood Road; Northwest on Harewood Road, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A06 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Fort Totten Drive, N.E. and Allison Street, N.E.; Southeast on Fort Totten Drive, N.E. to Hawaii Avenue, N.E.; Southeast on Hawaii Avenue, N.E. to Taylor Street, N.E.; West on Taylor Street, N.E. to Harewood Road, N.E.; South on Harewood Road, N.E. to Scale Gate Road, N.E.; West on Scale Gate Road, N.E. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to Harewood Road; Northwest on Harewood Road, N.W. to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; Northeast on Rock Creek Church Road, N.W. to Allison Street, N.W.; Northeast on Allison Street, N.W. to Allison Street, N.E.; Continuing northeast on Allison Street, N.E. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A07 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of North Capitol Street and Riggs Road; East on Riggs Road, N.E. to its intersection with the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; South along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to its intersection with a line extending Bates Road, N.E. from the southwest; Southwest along said line extending Bates Road, N.E. to Bates Road, N.E., and continuing southwest to Fort Totten Drive, N.E.; North on Fort Totten Drive, N.E. to Allison Street, N.E.; Southwest on Allison Street, N.E. to Allison Street, N.W., and continuing southwest to Rock Creek Church Road, N.W.; North on Rock Creek Church Road, N.W. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5A08 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue, N.E. and Kennedy Street, N.E.; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue, N.E. to 8th Street, N.E.; South on 8th Street, N.E. to Buchanan Street, N.E.; West on Buchanan Street, N.E. to its end at 6th Street, N.E.; Continuing west on a line extending Buchanan Street, N.E. west to the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; North along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Riggs Road, N.E.; Northeast on Riggs Road, N.E. to South Dakota Avenue, N.E.; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue, N.E. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 5B Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Taylor Street and the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; East on Taylor Street to 10th Street; North on 10th Street to Varnum Street; East on Varnum Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Michigan Avenue; East on Michigan Avenue to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to Webster Street; East on Webster Street to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to its end at Eastern Avenue; Northeast on a line extending 16th Street northeast to its intersection with the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Randolph Street; West on Randolph Street to 24th Street; South on 24th Street to Quincy Street; West on Quincy Street to South Dakota Avenue; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to Monroe Street; West on Monroe Street to 20th Street; South on 20th Street to Jackson Street; West on Jackson Street to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; North along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and Webster Street; East on Webster Street to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to Buchanan Street; West on Buchanan Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to its end at Eastern Avenue; Northeast on a line extending 16th Street northeast to its intersection with the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Randolph Street; West on Randolph Street to 24th Street; South on 24th Street to Quincy Street; West on Quincy Street to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Michigan Avenue and South Dakota Avenue; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to Monroe Street; West on Monroe Street to its intersection with the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; North along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Michigan Avenue; Northeast on Michigan Avenue to Bunker Hill Road; Northeast on Bunker Hill Road to Otis Street; East on Otis Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Michigan Avenue; Northeast on Michigan Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 13th Street and Monroe Street; East on Monroe Street to 20th Street; South on 20th Street to Jackson Street; West on Jackson Street to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Monroe Street and the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; East on Monroe Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; North along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Taylor Street and the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; East on Taylor Street to 10th Street; North on 10th Street to Varnum Street; East on Varnum Street to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Michigan Avenue; Southwest on Michigan Avenue to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Otis Street; West on Otis Street to Bunker Hill Road; Southwest on Bunker Hill Road to Michigan Avenue; Southwest on Michigan Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; North along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description ANC 5C Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and Quincy Street; East on Quincy Street to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to Randolph Street; East on Randolph Street to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along the centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with a line extending M Street from the west; West along said line extending M Street to the easternmost extent of M Street along the southern property boundary of the National Arboretum; West along said southern property boundary of the National Arboretum to the intersection of Bladensburg Road and Mount Olivet Road; Northwest on Mount Olivet Road to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the Montana Avenue traffic circle; Clockwise around the Montana Avenue traffic circle to its first intersection with New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to its intersection with the western boundary of the WMATA property identified as Square 3605 Lot 814; North along said western boundary of Square 3605 Lot 814 to its northernmost point at its intersection with the western boundary of the CSX property identified as Square 3605 Lot 837; North along said western boundary of Square 3605 Lot 837 to its northernmost point at its intersection with Rhode Island Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Jackson Street; East on Jackson Street to 20th Street; North on 20th Street to Monroe Street; East on Monroe Street to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and Quincy Street; East on Quincy Street to 24th Street; North on 24th Street to Randolph Street; East on Randolph Street to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Monroe Street; West on Monroe Street to Clinton Street; Southwest on Clinton Street to Myrtle Avenue; Southwest on Myrtle Avenue to South Dakota Avenue Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of South Dakota Avenue and Myrtle Avenue; Northeast on Myrtle Avenue to Clinton Street; Northeast on Clinton Street to Monroe Street; East on Monroe Street to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Bladensburg Road; Southwest on Bladensburg Road to its intersection with the centerline of the CSX railroad tracks; West along said centerline of the CSX railroad tracks to Montana Avenue; North on Montana Avenue to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Evarts Street; East on Evarts Street to 26th Street; North on 26th Street to Franklin Street; East on Franklin Street to Vista Street; Northeast on Vista Street to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Bladensburg Road and South Dakota Avenue; Northeast on Bladensburg Road to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southeast along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along said centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with the centerline of the CSX railroad tracks; West along said centerline of the CSX railroad tracks to its intersection with a line extending South Dakota Avenue from the northwest; Northwest along said line extending South Dakota Avenue, and continuing northwest on South Dakota Avenue to 33rd Place; Northeast on 33rd Place to Fort Lincoln Drive; Northwest on Fort Lincoln Drive to 31st Place; Southwest on 31st Place to South Dakota Avenue; Northwest on South Dakota Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Bladensburg Road and South Dakota Avenue; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to 31st Place; Northeast on 31st Place to Fort Lincoln Drive; Southeast on Fort Lincoln Drive to 33rd Place; Southwest on 33rd Place to South Dakota Avenue; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to its end at New York Avenue; Continuing southeast on a line extending South Dakota Avenue southeast to its intersection with the centerline of the CSX railroad tracks; East on said centerline of the CSX railroad tracks to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along said centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with a line extending M Street from the west; West along said line extending M Street to the easternmost extent of M Street along the southern property boundary of the National Arboretum; West along said southern property boundary of the National Arboretum to the intersection of Bladensburg Road and Mount Olivet Road; Northwest on Mount Olivet Road to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the Montana Avenue traffic circle; Clockwise around the Montana Avenue traffic circle to its first intersection with New York Avenue; East on New York Avenue to its eastern intersection with the Montana Avenue traffic circle; Counterclockwise around the Montana Avenue traffic circle to northbound Montana Avenue; North on Montana Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of the CSX railroad tracks; East on said centerline of the CSX railroad tracks to Bladensburg Road; Northeast on Bladensburg Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of W Street and 15th Street; East on W Street to Montana Avenue; South on Montana Avenue to the Montana Avenue traffic circle; Clockwise around the Montana Avenue traffic circle to its eastern intersection with New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to its intersection with the western boundary of the WMATA property identified as Square 3605 Lot 814; North along said western boundary of Square 3605 Lot 814 to its northernmost point at its intersection with the western boundary of the CSX property identified as Square 3605 Lot 837; North along said western boundary of Square 3605 Lot 837 to its northernmost point at its intersection with Rhode Island Avenue; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to Montana Avenue; Southeast on Montana Avenue to 14th Street; In a southerly direction on 14th Street to Downing Street; Northeast on Downing Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Rhode Island Avenue and 17th Street; South on 17th Street to Evarts Street; East on Evarts Street to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to W Street; West on W Street to 15th Street; In a northerly direction on 15th Street to Downing Street; Southwest on Downing Street to 14th Street; In a northerly direction on 14th Street to Montana Avenue; Northwest on Montana Avenue to Rhode Island Avenue; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5C07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Monroe Street and South Dakota Avenue; Southeast on South Dakota Avenue to Vista Street; Southwest on Vista Street to Franklin Street; West on Franklin Street to 26th Street; South on 26th Street to Evarts Street; West on Evarts Street to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Jackson Street; East on Jackson Street to 20th Street; North on 20th Street to Monroe Street; East on Monroe Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 5D Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Florida Avenue and the southwest corner of the District Government property identified as Square 3584 Lot 815; Southeast on Florida Avenue to Benning Road; East on Benning Road to the centerline of the Anacostia River; North along the centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with a line extending M Street from the west; West along said line extending M Street to the easternmost extent of M Street along the southern property boundary of the National Arboretum; West along said southern property boundary of the National Arboretum to the intersection of Bladensburg Road and Mount Olivet Road; Northwest on Mount Olivet Road to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the Montana Avenue traffic circle; Clockwise around the Montana Avenue traffic circle to its first intersection with New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to its intersection with the northwest corner of the District Government property identified as Square 3584 Lot 815; South along the western boundary of said Square 3584 Lot 815 to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D01 Boundaries.

All streets are in the northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Florida Avenue and the southwest corner of the District Government property identified as Square 3584 Lot 815; Southeast on Florida Avenue to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the Montana Avenue traffic circle; Clockwise around the Montana Avenue traffic circle to its western intersection with New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to its intersection with the northwest corner of the District Government property identified as Square 3584 Lot 815; South along the western boundary of said Square 3584 Lot 815 to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of West Virginia Avenue and Mount Olivet Road; Southeast on Mount Olivet Road to Bladensburg Road; Southwest on Bladensburg Road to Meigs Place; Northwest on Meigs Place to 16th Street; Southwest on 16th Street to Levis Street; Northwest on Levis Street to Holbrook Street; Northeast on Holbrook Street to Childress Street; Northwest on Childress Street to Trinidad Avenue; Southwest on Trinidad Avenue to Queen Street; Northwest on Queen Street to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Maryland Avenue and 21st Street; North on 21st Street to M Street along the southern property boundary of the National Arboretum; West along said southern property boundary of the National Arboretum to the intersection of Bladensburg Road and Mount Olivet Road; Southwest on Bladensburg Road to Maryland Avenue; Northeast on Maryland Avenue to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to L Street; East on L Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Maryland Avenue; Northeast on Maryland Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 21st Street and M Street; East on M Street to its end; Continuing east on a line extending M Street east to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; South along said centerline of the Anacostia River to Benning Road; West on Benning Road to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to Bennett Place; East on Bennett Place to 21st Street; North on 21st Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Maryland Avenue and 21st Street; South on 21st Street to Bennett Place; West on Bennett Place to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Benning Road; West on Benning Road to Bladensburg Road; Northeast on Bladensburg Road to Maryland Avenue; Northeast on Maryland Avenue to 17th Street; North on 17th Street to L Street; East on L Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Maryland Avenue; Northeast on Maryland Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of West Virginia Avenue and Oates Street; Southeast on Oates Street to Bladensburg Road; Southwest on Bladensburg Road to Florida Avenue; Northwest on Florida Avenue to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5D07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of West Virginia Avenue and Queen Street; Southeast on Queen Street to Trinidad Avenue; Northeast on Trinidad Avenue to Childress Street; Southeast on Childress Street to Holbrook Street; Southwest on Holbrook Street to Levis Street; Southeast on Levis Street to 16th Street; Northeast on 16th Street to Meigs Place; Southeast on Meigs Place to Bladensburg Road; Southwest on Bladensburg Road to Oates Street; Northwest on Oates Street to West Virginia Avenue; Northeast on West Virginia Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 5E Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Park Place, N.W. and Kenyon Street, N.W. ; East on Kenyon Street, N.W. to Irving Street, N.W.; East on Irving Street, N.W. to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Michigan Avenue; Northeast on Michigan Avenue, N.E. to the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; South along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Rhode Island Avenue, N.W.; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to its intersection with the northwest corner of the CSX property identified as Square 3605 Lot 837; South along the western boundary of said Square 3605 Lot 837 to its southernmost point at its intersection with the western boundary of the WMATA property identified as Square 3605 Lot 814; South along the western boundary of said Square 3605 Lot 814 to its southernmost point at its intersection with New York Avenue, N.E.; Continuing south across New York Avenue N.E. to the northwest corner of the District Government property identified as Square 3584 Lot 815; South along the western boundary of said Square 3584 Lot 815 to its southernmost point at its intersection with Florida Avenue, N.E.; Northwest on Florida Avenue, N.E. to New York Avenue, N.W.; Southwest on New York Avenue, N.W. to Kirby Street, N.W.; North on Kirby Street, N.W. to N Street, N.W.; West on N Street, N.W. to New Jersey Avenue, N.W.; Northwest on New Jersey Avenue, N.W. to Florida Avenue, N.W.; Southeast on Florida Avenue, N.W. to Rhode Island Avenue, N.W.; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue, N.W. to 2nd Street, N.W.; North on 2nd Street, N.W. to Bryant Street, N.W.; East on Bryant Street, N.W. to 1st Street, N.W.; North on 1st Street, N.W. to Michigan Avenue, N.W.; Northwest on Michigan Avenue, N.W. to Park Place, N.W.; North on Park Place, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Franklin Street and Michigan Avenue; Northeast on Michigan Avenue to the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; South along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Franklin Street; West on Franklin Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Franklin Street and 6th Street; East on Franklin Street to the centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks; South along said centerline of the WMATA Metrorail tracks to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Evarts Street; East on Evarts Street to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E03 Boundaries.

All streets are in the northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Rhode Island Avenue and Summit Place; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to its intersection with the northwest corner of the CSX property identified as Square 3605 Lot 837; South along the western boundary of said Square 3605 Lot 837 to its southernmost point at its intersection with the western boundary of the WMATA property identified as Square 3605 Lot 814; South along the western boundary of said Square 3605 Lot 814 to its southernmost point at its intersection with New York Avenue; Continuing south across New York Avenue to the northwest corner of the District Government property identified as Square 3584 Lot 815; South along the western boundary of said Square 3584 Lot 815 to its southernmost point at its intersection with Florida Avenue; Northwest on Florida Avenue to Eckington Place; North on Eckington Place to R Street; East on R Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to T Street; West on T Street to Summit Place; North on Summit Place to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of North Capitol Street and Rhode Island Avenue; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to Summit Place; South on Summit Place to T Street; East on T Street to 2nd Street; South on 2nd Street to R Street; West on R Street to Eckington Place; Southwest on Eckington Place to Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to North Capitol Street; North on north Capitol Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New Jersey Avenue and R Street; East on R Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Q Street; East on Q Street to Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to Kirby Street; North on Kirby Street to N Street; West on N Street to New Jersey Avenue; Northwest on New Jersey Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 2nd Street and Rhode Island Avenue; South on 2nd Street to Randolph Place; East on Randolph Place to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Florida Avenue; Northwest on North Capitol Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to R Street; West on R Street to New Jersey Avenue; Northwest on New Jersey Avenue to Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to Rhode Island Avenue; Northeast on Rhode Island Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 2nd Street and U Street; East on U Street to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Randolph Place; West on Randolph Place to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 2nd Street and Adams Street; East on Adams Street to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to U Street; West on U Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E09 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Park Place, N.W. and Kenyon Street, N.W. ; East on Kenyon Street, N.W. to Irving Street, N.W.; East on Irving Street, N.W. to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Michigan Avenue; East on Michigan Avenue, N.E. to Franklin Street, N.E.; Southeast on Franklin Street, N.E. to Lincoln Road, N.E.; South on Lincoln Road to Rhode Island Avenue, N.E.; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue, N.E. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to Adams Street; West on Adams Street, N.W. to 2nd Street, N.W.; North on 2nd Street, N.W. to Bryant Street, N.W.; East on Bryant Street, N.W. to 1st Street, N.W.; North on 1st Street NW to Michigan Avenue, N.W.; Northwest on Michigan Avenue, N.W. to Park Place, N.W.; North on Park Place, N.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 5E10 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Lincoln Road and Franklin Street; East on Franklin Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to Evarts Street; West on Evarts Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Rhode Island Avenue; Southwest on Rhode Island Avenue to Lincoln Road; Northeast on Lincoln Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 6A Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 8th Street and Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to H Street; East on H Street to Benning Road; East on Benning Road to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to C Street; East on C Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to the northern portion of East Capitol Street; West on the northern portion of East Capitol Street to 19th Street; Continuing west on East Capitol Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street, S.E. to the eastbound portion of East Capitol Street south of Lincoln Park; West along said eastbound portion of East Capitol Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street, S.E. to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to H Street; West on H Street to 7th Street; North on 7th to I Street; East on I Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description SMD 6A01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 8th Street and Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to H Street; West on H Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to G Street; West on G Street to 8th Street North on 8th Street to H Street; West on H Street to 7th Street; North on 7th to I Street; East on I Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 11th Street and H Street; East on H Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to E Street; West on E Street to Maryland Avenue; Southwest on Maryland Avenue to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to G Street; East on G Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Maryland Avenue and E Street; East on E Street to 10th Street; South on 10th Street to C Street; East on C Street to 12th Street; South on 12th Street to the westbound portion of East Capitol Street north of Lincoln Park; West on East Capitol Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to Maryland Avenue; Northeast on Maryland Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of C Street and 12th Street; East on C Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street, S.E. to the eastbound portion of East Capitol Street south of Lincoln Park; West along said eastbound portion of East Capitol Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street, S.E. to the eastbound portion of East Capitol Street north of Lincoln Park; East on East Capitol Street to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 10th Street and E Street; East on E Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to C Street; West on C Street to 10th Street; North on 10th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 13th Street and Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to H Street; East on H Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Gales Street; East on Gales Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Isherwood Street; West on Isherwood Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to E Street; West on E Street to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 15th Street and Benning Road; East on Benning Road to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to E Street; West on E Street to 18th Street; South on 18th to D Street; West on D Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Gales Street; West on Gales Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6A08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 18th Street and E Street; East on E Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to C Street; East on C Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to the northern portion of East Capitol Street; West on the northern portion of East Capitol Street to 19th Street; Continuing west on East Capitol Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Isherwood Street; East on Isherwood Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to D Street; East on D Street to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 6B Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of a line extending South Capitol Street north and a line extending East Capitol Street west; East on said line extending East Capitol Street, and continuing east on East Capitol Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to the eastbound portion of East Capitol Street south of Lincoln Park; East along said eastbound portion of East Capitol Street to 13 Street; North on 13th Street to East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to its intersection with the property line of Congressional Cemetery; in an easterly direction along the property line of Congressional Cemetery to its easternmost point and continuing east on the same bearing to the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along the centerline of the Anacostia River to Interstate 295; North on Interstate 295 to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to M Street; West on M Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to the Southeast Expressway; Northwest on the Southeast Expressway to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of a line extending South Capitol Street northward and a line extending East Capitol Street westward; East on said line extending East Capitol Street, and continuing east on East Capitol Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to A Street; West on A Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to North Carolina Avenue; Southwest on North Carolina Avenue to 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to the Southeast Expressway; Northwest on the Southeast Expressway to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street and continuing north along a line extending South Capitol Street north to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 5th Street and East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to 9th Street. South on 9th Street to A Street; West on A Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to its first intersection with D Street; East on D Street to 9th Street; South on 9th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to its first intersection with D Street; West on D Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to D Street; West on D Street to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to North Carolina Avenue; Northeast on North Carolina Avenue to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to A Street; East on A Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the 3rd Street and D Street East on D Street to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to D Street; East on D Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to the Southeast Expressway; Northwest on the Southeast Expressway to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 9th Street and South Carolina Avenue; Northeast on South Carolina Avenue to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to C Street; East on C Street to 12th Street; South on 12th Street to K Street; West on K Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to M Street; West on M Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street the Southeast Expressway; Southeast on the Southeast Expressway to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to its first intersection with D Street; East on D Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 9th Street and East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to the eastbound portion of East Capitol Street south of Lincoln Park East along said eastbound portion of East Capitol Street to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Independence Avenue; West on Independence Avenue to 12th Street; South on 12th Street to C Street; West on C Street to 11th Street; South on 11th Street to South Carolina Avenue; Southwest on South Carolina Avenue to D Street; West on D Street to 8th Street; North on 8th Street to A Street; East on A Street to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of South Carolina Avenue and Kentucky Avenue; Southeast on Kentucky Avenue to C Street; East on C Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest on the Anacostia River to Interstate 295; North on Interstate 295 to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to the Southeast Freeway; East on Southeast Freeway to its intersection with a line extending 14th Street from the north; North along said line extending 14th Street and continuing north on 14th Street to Potomac Avenue; Continuing north along a line extending 14th Street north to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to its intersection with the portion of C Street north of South Carolina Avenue; East on said portion of C Street to South Carolina Avenue; Northeast on South Carolina Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Pennsylvania Avenue and 12th Street; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to its intersection with a line extending 14th Street from the south; South along said line extending 14th Street and continuing south on 14th Street to its end at L Street; Continuing south along a line extending 14th Street south to the Southeast Freeway; West on the Southeast Freeway to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to K Street; East on K Street to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B08 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of East Capitol Street and 13th Street; East on East Capitol Street to 15th Street; South on 15th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to C Street; West on C Street to Kentucky Avenue; Northwest on Kentucky Avenue to South Carolina Avenue; Southwest on South Carolina Avenue to C Street; West on C Street to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to Independence Avenue; East on Independence Avenue to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B09 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to its intersection with the property line of Congressional Cemetery; In an easterly direction along the property line of Congressional Cemetery to its easternmost point, and continuing east on the same bearing to the centerline of the Anacostia River, Southwest along the centerline of the Anacostia River to Pennsylvania Avenue Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to C Street; East on C Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6B10 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 15th Street and East Capitol Street: East on East Capitol Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to East Capitol Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 6C Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of New York Avenue, N.E. and Florida Avenue, N.E.; Southeast on Florida Avenue, N.E. to 8th Street, N.E.; South on 8th Street, N.E. to I Street, N.E.; West on I Street, N.E. to 7th Street, N.E.; South on 7th Street, N.E. to H Street, N.E.; East on H Street, N.E. to 8th Street, N.E.; South on 8th Street, N.E. to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to its end at 1st Street; Continuing west along a line extending East Capitol Street west to its intersection with a line extending South Capitol Street north; North along said line extending South Capitol Street north to its intersection with Constitution Avenue; West on Constitution Avenue, N.W. to the point where it crosses above the eastern boundary of Interstate 395; North along the eastern boundary of Interstate 395 to the point where it crosses below Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; Southwest on Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to New York Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on New York Avenue, N.E. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6C01 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Constitution Avenue, N.E. and 8th Street, N.E.; South on 8th Street, N.E. to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to its end at 1st Street; Continuing west along a line extending East Capitol Street west to its intersection with a line extending South Capitol Street north; North along said line extending South Capitol Street north to its intersection with Constitution Avenue; East along Constitution Avenue, N.E. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6C02 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of the eastern boundary of Interstate 395 and Massachusetts Avenue, N.W.; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue, N.W. to Massachusetts Avenue, N.E.; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue, N.E. to Columbus Circle, N.E.; Counter-clockwise around Columbus Circle, N.E. to F Street, N.E.; East on F Street, N.E. to 2nd Street, N.E.; South on 2nd Street, N.E. to the alley between E Street, N.E. and F Street, N.E.; In an easterly direction along said alley between E Street, N.E. and F Street, N.E. to 3rd Street, N.E.; South on 3rd Street, N.E. to E Street, N.E.; East on E Street, N.E. to 4th Street, N.E.; South on 4th Street, N.E. to Constitution Avenue, N.E.; West on Constitution Avenue, N.E. to the eastern boundary of Interstate 395; North along the eastern boundary of Interstate 395 to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 6th Street and F Street; East on F Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to Constitution Avenue; West on Constitution Avenue to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to E Street; East on E Street to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of North Capitol Street and H Street; East on H Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to I Street; East on I Street to 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to H Street; East on H Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to F Street; East on F Street to 6th Street; South on 6th Street to E Street; West on E Street to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to the alley between E Street and F Street; In a westerly direction along said alley between E Street and F Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to F Street; West on F Street to Columbus Circle; Clockwise around Columbus Circle to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6C05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 3rd Street and K Street; East on K Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to I Street; West on I Street to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to H Street; East on H Street to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to F Street; West on F Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to H Street; West on H Street to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New York Avenue and Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to 8th Street; South on 8th Street to K Street; West on K Street to 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to I Street; West on I Street to 2nd Street; South on 2nd Street to H Street; West on H Street to North Capitol Street; North on North Capitol Street to New York Avenue; Northeast on New York Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 6D Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street, S.W. and Independence Avenue, S.W.; East on Independence Avenue, S.W. to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to the Southeast Freeway (spur to Interstate 295); Due southeast on the Southeast Freeway (spur to Interstate 295) to 7th Street, S.E.; South on 7th Street, S.E. to M Street, S.E.; East on M Street, S.E. to 11th Street, S.E.; South on 11th Street, S.E. to the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along in the centerline of the Anacostia River and the projection of that centerline to the Virginia shoreline of the Potomac River; North along said Virginia shoreline of the Potomac River to 14th Street; North on 14th Street, S.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street and Independence Avenue; East on Independence Avenue to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to M Street; West on M Street to Maine Avenue; Northwest on Maine Avenue to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D02 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Delaware Avenue, S.W. and M Street, S.W. . Northeast on Delaware Avenue, S.W. to I Street, S.W.; West on I Street, S. W. to 3rd Street, S.W.; North on 3rd Street, S.W. to G Street; Continuing north along a line extending 3rd Street to its continuation at E Street, S.W. , and continuing north on 3rd Street to Independence Avenue, S.W.; East on Independence Avenue, S.W. to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to I Street, S.W.; East on I Street, S.E. to New Jersey Avenue, S.E.; Southeast on New Jersey Avenue, S.E. to K Street, S.E.; East on K Street, S.E. to 2nd Street, S.E.; South on 2nd Street, S.E. to L Street, S.E.; West on L Street, S.E. to 1st Street, S.E.; South on 1st Street, S.E. to Potomac Avenue, S.E.; Southwest on Potomac Avenue, S.E. to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to M Street; West on M Street, S.W. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Independence Avenue and 4th Street; South on 4th Street to I Street; East on I Street to Wesley Place; South on Wesley Place to K Street; East on K Street to 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to M Street; East on M Street to Delaware Avenue; Northeast on Delaware Avenue to I Street; West on I Street to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street, S.W. to G Street; Continuing north along a line extending 3rd Street to its continuation at E Street, and continuing north on 3rd Street to Independence Avenue; West on Independence Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of M Street and 4th Street; South on 4th Street to the portion of O Street to its east; East on O Street to its end, and continuing east along a line extending O Street to its continuation at 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to P Street; West on P Street and continuing west along a line extending P Street to the Virginia shoreline of the Potomac River; North along said Virginia Shore of the Potomac River to 14th Street; Northeast on 14th Street to Maine Avenue; Southeast on Maine Avenue to M Street; East on M Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of I Street and 4th Street; South on 4th Street to the portion of O Street to its east; East on O Street to its end, and continuing east along a line extending O Street to its continuation at 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to P Street; West on P Street and continuing west along a line extending P Street to the Virginia shoreline of the Potomac River; South along said Virginia Shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending the center line of the Anacostia River; Northeast along said line extending the center line of the Anacostia River and continuing northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to South Capitol Street; Northwest on South Capitol Street to Potomac Avenue; Southwest on Potomac Avenue to R Street; West on R Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to Canal Street; Northeast on Canal Street to Delaware Avenue; North on Delaware Avenue to M Street; West on M Street to 3rd Street; North on 3rd Street to K Street; West on K Street to Wesley Place; North on Wesley Place to I Street; West on I Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Delaware Avenue and M Street; East on M Street to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to Potomac Avenue; Southwest on Potomac Avenue to R Street; West on R Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to Canal Street; Northeast on Canal Street to Delaware Avenue; North on Delaware Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6D07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the Southeast Freeway (spur to Interstate 295) and South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to I Street; East on I Street to New Jersey Avenue; Southeast on New Jersey Avenue to K Street; East on K Street to 2nd Street; South on 2nd Street to L Street; West on L Street to 1st Street; South on 1st Street to Potomac Avenue; Southwest on Potomac Avenue to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to the center line of the Anacostia River; Northeast on the center line of the Anacostia River to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to M Street; West on M Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to the Southeast Freeway (spur to I-295); Northwest on the Southeast Freeway (spur to I-295) to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 6E Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of T Street and Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to New Jersey Avenue; Southeast on New Jersey Avenue to N Street; East on N Street to Kirby Street; South on Kirby Street to New York Avenue; Northeast on New York Avenue to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to M Street; West on M Street to the alley running along the eastern side of the Washington Convention Center; North on said alley to N Street; West on N Street to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to P Street; West on P Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to S Street; East on S Street to Wiltberger Street; North on Wiltberger Street to T Street; East on T Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6E01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 11th Street and S Street; East on S Street to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to R Street; East on R Street to Marion Street; South on Marion Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to 7th Street; South on 7th Street to O Street; West on O Street to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to P Street; West on P Street to 11th Street; North on 11th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description SMD 6E02 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of T Street and Florida Avenue; Southeast on Florida Avenue to New Jersey Avenue; Southeast on New Jersey Avenue to O Street; West on O Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to Q Street; East on Q Street to Marion Street; North on Marion Street to R Street; West on R Street to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to S Street; East on S Street to Wiltberger Street; North on Wiltberger Street to T Street; East on T Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6E03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 9th Street and O Street; East on O Street to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to M Street; West on M Street to the alley running along the eastern side of the Washington Convention center; North on said alley to N Street; West on N Street to 9th Street; North on 9th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6E04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 5th Street and O Street; East on O Street to New Jersey Avenue; Southeast on New Jersey Avenue to N Street; East on N Street to Kirby Street; South on Kirby Street to New York Avenue; Southwest on New York Avenue to 7th Street; North on 7th Street to M Street; East on M Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6E05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New York Avenue and 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; West on Massachusetts Avenue to 7th Street North on 7th Street to New York Avenue; Northeast on New York Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6E06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New York Avenue and North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to L Street; West on a line extended west from L Street to 1st Street; North on 1st Street to New York Avenue; Northeast on New York Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 6E07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of New York Avenue and 1st Street; South on 1st Street to a line extended west from L Street; East on said line extended west from L Street to North Capitol Street; South on North Capitol Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to New York Avenue; Northeast on New York Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 7B Boundaries.

All streets located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the Anacostia River and a line extended west from Croffut Place; East on said line extended from Croffut Place to Croffut Place; Continuing East on Croffut Place to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to its southwestern intersection with Randle Circle; Counterclockwise around Randle Circle to Ft. Dupont Drive; East on Ft. Dupont Drive to Ft. Davis Drive; South on Ft. Davis Drive to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 42nd Street; South on 42nd Street to Ft. Dupont Street; Southwest on Ft. Dupont Street to Q. Street; Northwest on Q Street to Ft. Davis Street; Southwest on Ft. Davis Street to R Street; Southeast on R Street to 40th Street; South on 40th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to Naylor Road; Northeast on Naylor Road to 25th Street; North on 25th Street to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to Nicholson Street; Northwest on Nicholson Street to Anacostia Drive, S.E.; Continuing Northwest along a line connecting to the intersection of Pennsylvania Avenue and the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the Anacostia River and a line extended west from Croffut Place S.E.; East on said line extended from Croffut Place to Croffut Place; Continuing east along Croffut Place to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to Nash Place; Northwest on Nash Place to Fairlawn Avenue; Continuing northwest along a line extending Nash Place to the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Pennsylvania Avenue and 28th Street; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to 30th Street; South on 30th Street extended across Ft. Circle Park to V Place; East on V Place to 31st Street; South on 31st Street to W Street; East on W Street to 32nd Place; South on 32nd Place to Alabama Avenue; Southwest on Alabama Avenue to Naylor Road; North on Naylor Road to 27th Street; North on 27th Street to Q Street; East on Q Street to 28th Street; North on 28th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the Anacestia River and a line extending Nash Street to the northwest; Southeast along said line extending Nash Street to Nash Street; Continuing southeast on Nash Street to Minnesota Avenue; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to M Street; Southeast on M Street to 30th Street; South on 30th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 28th Street; South on 28th Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to 27th Street; South on 27th Street to Naylor Road; North on Naylor Road to 25th Street; North on 25th Street to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to Nicholson Street; Northwest on Nicholson Street to Anacostia Drive; Continuing northwest along a line connecting to the intersection of Pennsylvania Avenue and the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the southwest intersection of Minnesota Avenue and Randle Circle; Counter-clockwise around Randle Circle to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 34th Street; South on 34th Street to M Street; West on M Street to Branch Avenue; South on Branch Avenue to Pope Street; Southeast on Pope Street to Nash Place; West on Nash Place to Highwood Drive; Southeast on Highwood Drive to its second intersection with Carpenter Street; East on Carpenter Street to Texas Avenue; Southwest on Texas Avenue to Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to Alabama Ave; Southwest on Alabama Avenue to 32nd Place; North on 32nd Place to W Street; West on W Street to 31st Street; North on 31st Street to V Place; West on V Place to 30th Street; North on 30th Street extended across Ft. Circle Park to M Street; Northwest on M Street to Minnesota Avenue; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and Branch Avenue; South on Branch Avenue to Denver Street; Southeast on Denver Street to Highview Terrace; Northeast on Highview Terrace to 34th Street; Southeast on 34th Street to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to Naylor Road; Northwest on Naylor Road to Alabama Avenue; Northeast on Alabama Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeast on Pennsylvania Avenue to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to 34th Street; Northwest on 34th Street to Highview Terrace; Southwest on Highview Terrace to Denver Street; Northwest on Denver Street to Branch Avenue; North on Branch Avenue to Alabama Avenue; Northeast on Alabama Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7B07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the southeast intersection of Randle Circle and Massachusetts Avenue; Counter- clockwise around Randle Circle to Ft. Dupont Drive; East on Ft. Dupont Drive to Ft. Davis Drive; South on Ft. Davis Drive to Massachusetts Avenue; Southeast on Massachusetts Avenue to 42nd Street; South on 42nd Street to Ft. Dupont Street; Southwest on Ft. Dupont Street to Q Street; Northwest on Q Street to Ft. Davis Street; Southwest on Ft. Davis Street to R Street; Southeast on R Street to 40th Street; South on 40th Street to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to Texas Avenue; Northeast on Texas Avenue to Carpenter Street; West on Carpenter Street to Highwood Drive; West on Highwood Drive to Nash Place; East on Nash Place to Pope Street; Northwest on Pope Street to Branch Avenue; North on Branch Avenue to M Street; East on M Street to 34th Street; North on 34th Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 7C Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Minnesota Avenue and Eastern Avenue; Southeast on Eastern Avenue to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 47th Street; North on 47th Street to 47th Place; South on 47th Place to Edson Street; West on Edson Place to 45th Street; North on 45th Street to Foote Street; East on Foote Street to 46th Street; North on 46th Street to Grant Street; West on Grant Street to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Southeast on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 46th Street: North on a line extending 46th Street to the north Continuing north on 46th Street to Jay Street; West on Jay Street to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to Sherriff Road; East on Sherriff Road to 45th Street; North on 45th Street to Meade Street; East on Meade Street to Minnesota Avenue; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to the beginning point. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7C01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 48th Street and Jay Street; East on Jay Street to 51st Street; South on 51st Street to Hayes Street; East on Hayes Street to Division Avenue; South on Division Avenue to Cloud Place; West on Cloud Place to 51st Street; North on 51st Street to Fitch Place; Northeast on Fitch Place to 49th Place; North on 49th Place to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; West on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 49th Street; South on 49th Street to its intersection with the Watts Branch stream; West along the Watts Branch stream to its intersection with a line extending north from 48th Place; South along said line to Foote Street; West on Foote Street to 47th Place; South on 47th Place to Edson Place; West on Edson Place to 45th Street; North on 45th Street to Foote Street; East on Foote Street to 46th Street; North on 46th Street to Grant Street; West on Grant Street to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Southeast on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 48th Street; North on 48th Street to the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Division Avenue and the Watts Branch Stream; Southeast along the Watts Branch Stream to 55th Street; South on 55th Street to Clay Place; East on Clay Place to 56th Street; South on 56th Street to Blaine Street East on Blaine Street to 57th Place; South on 57th Place to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 50th Street; North on 50th Street to Blaine Street; East on Blaine Street to Division Avenue; North on Division Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 49th Street and Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; East on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 49th Place; South on 49th Place to Fitch Place; East on Fitch Place to 51st Street; South on 51st Street to Cloud Place; East on Cloud Place to Division Avenue; South on Division Avenue to Blaine Street; West on Blaine Street to 50th Street; South on 50th Street to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 47th Street; North on 47th Street to 47th Place; North on 47th Place to Foote Street; East on Foote Street to 48th Place; North on 48th Place and continuing north on a line extending 48th Place to the Watts Branch Stream; East along the Watts Branch Stream to 49th Street; North on 49th Street to the point of the beginning [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 44th Street and Sherriff Road; East on Sherriff Road to 51st Street; North on 51st Street to Lee Street; East on Lee Street to Eastern Avenue; Southeast on Eastern Avenue to Division Avenue; South on Division Avenue to Hayes Street; West on Hayes Street to 51st Street; North on 51st Street to Jay Street; West on Jay Street to 48th Street; South on 48th Street to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Northwest on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 46th Street; North on a line extending 46th Street to the north Continuing North on 46th Street to Jay Street; West on Jay Street to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7C05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 59th and Foote Street; East on Foote Street to Eastern Avenue; Southeast on Eastern Avenue to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 57th Place; North on 57th Place to Blaine Street; West on Blaine Street to 56th Street; North on 56th Street to Clay Place; West on Clay Place to 55th Street; North on 55th Street to Eads Street; East on Eads Street to 59th Street; North on 59th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Division Avenue and Eastern Avenue; Southeast on Eastern Avenue to Foote Street; West on Foote Street to 59th Street; South on 59th Street to Eads Street; West on Eads Street to 55th Street; South on 55th Street to the Watts Branch Stream; Northwest along the Waits Branch Stream to Division Avenue; North on Division Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description on SMD 7C07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Minnesota Avenue and Eastern Avenue; South on Eastern Avenue to Lee Street; West on Lee Street to 51st Street; South on 51st Street to Sheriff Road; West on Sheriff. to 45th Street; North on 45th Street to Meade Street; East on Meade Street to Minnesota Avenue; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of for ANC 7D Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant except where otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the Anacostia River and Eastern Avenue; Southeast on Eastern Avenue to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to Meade Street; West on Meade Street to 45th Street; South on 45th Street to Sherriff Road; West on Sherriff Road to 44th Street; South on 44th Street to Jay Street; East on Jay Street to 46th Street; South on 46th Street and continuing south along a line extending 46th Street to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Northwest on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 44th Street; South on 44th Street to Grant Street; East on Grant Street to 46th Street; South on 46th Street to Foote Street; West on Foote Street to 45th Street; South on 45th Street to Edson Place; East on Edson Place to 47th Place; North on 47th Place to 47th Street; South on 47th Street to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to 42nd Street; North on 42nd Street to Blaine Street; East on Blaine Street to Benning Road; Northwest on Benning Road to 42nd Street; North on 42nd Street to Grant Street; West on Grant Street and continuing west along a line extending Grant Street to Kenilworth Avenue; Southwest on Kenilworth Avenue to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to Independence Avenue; Southwest on Independence Avenue to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to East Capitol Street; East on the northern spur of East Capitol Street to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to C Street; East on C Street to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to Benning Road; East on Benning Road to the centerline of the Anacostia River; North-northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description for SMD 7D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant except where otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 19th Street and Benning Road; East on Benning Road to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; South along the centerline of the Anacostia River to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to Independence Avenue; Southwest on Independence Avenue to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to East Capitol Street; East on the northern spur of East Capitol Street to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to C Street; West on C Street to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description for SMD 7D02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Anacostia Avenue and Douglas Street; Southeast on Douglas Street to Kenilworth Avenue; Southwest on Kenilworth Avenue to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Southeast on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to its intersection with the southeastern extension of the portion of Hayes Street north of Kenilworth Avenue; Northwest along said line to Hayes Street Continuing Northwest along Hayes Street to its intersection with the northwestern boundary of census block 96.02.1002.; Northeast along said boundary to its intersection with the northwest boundary of census block 96.02.1001; Northeast along said boundary to its intersection with the northwest boundary of census block 96.02.1000; Northeast along said boundary to its intersection with Jay Street; Southeast on Jay Street to Kenilworth Terrace; North on Kenilworth Terrace to Lee Street; Northwest on Lee Street to 40th Street; North on 40th Street to Anacostia Avenue; East on Anacostia Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description for SMD 7D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Eastern Avenue and the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southeast on Eastern Avenue to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to Meade Street; West on Meade Street to 45th Street; South on 45th Street to Sherriff Road; West on Sherriff Road to Minnesota Avenue; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Northwest on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to Kenilworth Avenue; Northeast on Kenilworth Avenue to Douglas Street; Northwest on Douglas Street to Anacostia Avenue; Southwest on Anacostia Avenue to 40th Street; South on 40th Street to Lee Street; Southeast on Lee Street to Kenilworth Terrace; South on Kenilworth Terrace to the Watts Branch Stream; Northwest along the Watts Branch Stream to the point where it meets the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Benning Road and the centerline of the Anacostia River; East on Benning Road to Kenilworth Avenue; Southwest on Kenilworth Avenue to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to the centerline of the Anacostia River; North along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 44th Street and Grant Street; East on Grant Street to 46th Street; South on 46th Street to Foote Street; West on Foote Street to 45th Street; South on 45th Street to Edson Place; East on Edson Place to 47th Place; North on 47th Place to 47th Street; South on 47th Street to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to its intersections with a line extending 42nd Street south; North along said line to 42nd Street; Continuing north on 42nd Street to Blaine Street; East on Blaine Street to Benning Road; Southeast on Benning Road to 44th Street; North on 44th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7D06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Minnesota Avenue Sherriff Road; East on Sherriff Road to 44th Street; South on 44th Street to Jay Street; East on Jay Street to 46th Street; South on 46th Street to the point where it extends to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; Northwest on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to 44th Street; South on 44th Street to Benning Road; Northwest on Benning Road to 42nd Street; North on 42nd Street to Grant Street; West on Grant Street to Minnesota Ave; Continuing west along a line extending Grant Street west to Kenilworth; Northeast on Kenilworth Avenue to Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue; East on Nannie Helen Burroughs Avenue to Minnesota Avenue; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7D07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Northeast quadrant. Beginning at the point where the Watts Branch Stream meets the Anacostia River; East along the Watts branch Stream to Kenilworth Terrace; South on Kenilworth Terrace to Jay Street; Northwest on Jay Street to its intersection with the northwest boundary of census block 96.02.1000; Southwest along said boundary to its intersection with the northwest boundary of census block 96.02.1001; Southwest along said boundary to its intersection with the northwest boundary of census block 96.02.1002: Southwest along said boundary to its intersection with Hayes Street; Southeast on Hayes Street to Kenilworth Avenue; Southwest on Kenilworth Avenue to Benning Road; West on Benning Road to the centerline of the Anacostia River; North on the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Descriptions of ANC 7E Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Texas Avenue and East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 40th Street; Northeast on 40th Street to R Street; Northwest on R Street to Ft. Davis Street; Northeast on Ft. Davis Street to Q Street; Southeast on Q Street to Ft. Dupont Street; Northeast on Ft. Dupont Street to 42nd Street; North on 42nd Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Ft. Davis Drive; North on Ft. Davis Drive to Ridge Road; Southeast on Ridge Road to G Street; East on G Street to Benning Road; Northwest on Benning Road to B Street; West on B Street to Texas Avenue; North on Texas Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and G Street; South on Alabama Avenue to Hilltop Terrace; East on Hilltop Terrace to 46th Street; South on 46th Street to H Street; East on H Street to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to Reed Terrace; West on Reed Terrace to 45th Place; North on 45th Place to Hillside Road; West on Hillside Road to Burns Street; Continuing West on a line extending Hillside Road to Ridge Road; Northwest on Ridge Road to G Street; East on G Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Ft. Davis Drive and Ridge Road; South on Ridge Road to its intersection with a line extending Hillside Road to the west; East on said line to Hillside Road; Continuing East on Hillside Road to 45th Place; South on 45th Place to Reed Terrace; East on Reed Terrace to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to Pennsylvania Avenue; Northwest on Pennsylvania Avenue to 40th Street; North on 40th Street to R Street; Northwest on R Street to Ft. Davis Street; Northeast on Ft. Davis Street to Q Street; Southeast on Q Street to Ft. Dupont Street; Northeast on Ft. Dupont Street to 42nd Street; North on 42nd Street to Massachusetts Avenue; Northwest on Massachusetts Avenue to Ft. Davis Drive; North on Ft. Davis Drive to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 51st and E Street; East on E Street to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to H Street, West on H Street to 46th Street; North on 46th Street to Hilltop Terrace; West on Hilltop Terrace to Alabama Avenue; North on Alabama Avenue to G Street; East on G Street to 51st Street; North on 51st Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Texas Avenue and East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to 49th Street; South on 49th Street to Street Louis Street; South on Street Louis Street extended to Queens Stroll Place; East on Queens Stroll Place to 51st Street; South on 51st Street to G Street; West on G Street to Benning Road; Northwest on Benning Road to B Street; West on B Street to Texas Avenue; North on Texas Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 49th Street and East Capitol Street; East on east Capitol Street to Central Avenue; Southeast on Central Avenue to 51st Street; South on 51st Street to C Street; East on C Street to 53rd Street; South on 53rd Street to E Street; West on E Street to 51st Street; North on 51st Street to Queens Stroll Place; West on Queens Stroll Place to Street Louis Street: Northeast on Street Louis Street extended to 49th Street; North on 49th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 51st Street and Central Avenue; Southeast on Central Avenue to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to E Street; West on E Street to 53rd Street; North on 53rd Street to C Street; West on C Street to 51st Street; North on 51st Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7E07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Central Avenue and East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to Central Avenue; Northwest on Central Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 7F Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Kenilworth Avenue, N.E. and a line extended west from Grant Street, N.E.; East on said line to Grant Street, N. E.; Continuing East on Grant Street, N.E. to 42nd Street, N.E.; South on 42nd Street to Benning Road, N.E.; Southeast on Benning Road, N.E. to Blaine Street, N.E.; West on Blaine Street, N.E. to 42nd Street, N.E.; South on 42nd Street, N.E. to East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to Texas Avenue, S.E.; South on Texas Avenue, S.E. to B Street, S.E.; East on B Street, S.E. to Benning Road, S.E.; South on Benning Road, S.E. to G Street, S.E.; West on G Street, S.E. to Ridge Road, S.E.; North on Ridge Road, S.E. to Ft. Davis Drive, S.E.; Southwest on Ft. Davis Drive, S.E. to Ft. Dupont Drive, S.E.; West on Ft. Dupont Drive, S.E. to Randle Circle, S.E.; Clockwise around Randle Circle, S.E. to Minnesota Avenue, S.E. ; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue, S.E. to Croffut Place, S.E.; West on Croffut Place, S.E. extended to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along the centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with a line extending east from the northern property line of the eastern portion of Congressional Cemetery; West along said line, and continuing in a westerly direction along said boundary of the Congressional Cemetery to its intersection with 19th Street, S.E.; North on 19th Street to Independence Avenue, S.E.; East on Independence Avenue, S.E. to East Capitol Street, S.E.; East on East Capitol Street, S.E. to Kenilworth Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on Kenilworth Avenue, N.E. to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7F01 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Kenilworth Avenue, N.E. and a line extended west from Grant Street, N.E.; East on said line to Grant Street, N. E.; Continuing east on Grant Street, N.E. to 42nd Street, N.E.; South on 42nd Street, N.E. to Benning Road, N.E.; Southeast on Benning Road, N.E. to Blaine Street, N.E.; West on Blaine Street, N.E. to 42nd Street, N.E.; South on 42nd Street, N.E. to East Capitol Street; West on East Capitol Street to Minnesota Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue, N.E. to Blaine Street, N.E.; Northwest on Blaine Street, N.E. to 35th Street, N.E.; Continuing Northwest along a line extending Blaine Street to Kenilworth Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on Kenilworth Avenue, N.E. to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7F02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of East Capitol Street and Texas Avenue; South on Texas Avenue to E Street; East on E Street to Alabama Avenue; South on Alabama Avenue to G Street; West on G Street to Ridge Road; Northeast on Ridge Road to E Street; East on E Street to 40th Place; North on 40th Place to Burns Street; Continuing north on Burns Street to C Street; West on C Street to Bums Place; Northwest on Burns Place to Bums Court; Continuing northwest along a line extending Burns Place to B Street; Northeast on B Street to East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD7F03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of B Street and Texas Avenue; East on B Street to Benning Road; South on Benning Road to G Street; West on G Street to Alabama Avenue; North on Alabama Avenue to E Street; West on E Street to Texas Avenue; North on Texas Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7F04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Minnesota Avenue and B Street; East on B Street to Ridge Road; Southeast on Ridge Road to 37th Street; Southwest on 37th Street to Ely Place East on Ely Place to Ridge Road; South on Ridge Road to Ft. Davis Drive; South on Ft. Davis to Ft. Dupont Drive; West on Ft. Dupont Drive to Randle Circle; Clockwise around Randle Circle to Minnesota Avenue; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7F05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of East Capitol Street and Ridge Road; East on East Capitol Street to B Street; Southwest on B Street to its intersection with a line extending Burns Place to the northwest; Southeast on said line to Burns Place; Continuing southeast along Burns Place to C Street; East on C Street to Burns Street; South on Burns Street to 40th Place; South on 40th Place to E Street; West on E Street to Ely Place; West on Ely Place to 37th Street; North on 37th Street to Ridge Road; Northwest on Ridge Road to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 7F06 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the Anacostia River and East Capitol Street; East on East Capitol Street to Kenilworth Avenue, N.E.; Northeast on Kenilworth Avenue, N.E. to its intersection with a line extending Blaine Street to the northwest; Southeast on said line to Blaine Street, N.E.; Continuing southeast on Blaine Street, N.E. to Minnesota Avenue, N.E.; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue, N.E. to Ridge Road S.E.; Southeast on Ridge Road, S.E. to B Street, S.E.; West on B Street, S.E. to Minnesota Avenue, S.E.; Southwest on Minnesota Avenue, S.F. to Croffut Place, S.E.; West on Croffut Place, S.E. extended west to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; North along the centerline of the Anacostia River to point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 7F07 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of 19th Street, S.E. and Independence, Avenue S.E.; East on Independence Avenue, S.E. to East Capitol Street, S.E.; East on East Capitol Street, S.E. to the centerline of the Anacostia River; Southwest along the centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with a line extending East from the northern property line of the eastern portion of Congressional Cemetery; West along said line, and continuing in a westerly direction along said boundary of the Congressional Cemetery to its intersection with 19th Street, S.E.; North on 19th Street, S.E. to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 8A Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of the center line of the Anacostia River and Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeasterly along a line extending to the intersection of Nicholson Street and Anacostia Drive; Southeast on Nicholson Street to Minnesota Avenue; Northeasterly on Minnesota Avenue to 25th Street; South on 25th Street to Naylor Road; Continuing South on Naylor Road to Altamont Place; Southwest on Altamont Place to Good Hope Road; Northwest on Good Hope Road to 22nd Street; Southwest from said intersection across Fort Stanton Park to the intersection of 17th Street and Morris Road; West on Morris Road to Pomeroy Road; Southwest on Pomeroy Road to Stanton Road; North on Stanton Road to Douglass Road; West on Douglass Road to Stanton Road; West on Stanton Road to Sheridan Road; North on Sheridan Road to Howard Road; Northwest on Howard Street to South Capitol Street; Continuing northwest on South Capitol Street to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along said centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the center line of the Anacostia River and Pennsylvania Avenue; Southeasterly along a line extending to the intersection of Nicholson Street and Anacostia Drive; Southeast on Nicholson Street to Minnesota Ave; Northeast on Minnesota Avenue to 25th Street; South on 25th Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to R Street; West on R Street to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Q Street; West on Q Street to 16th Street; North on 16th Street and continuing north along a line extending 16th Street to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 16th Street and Q Street; East on Q Street to 18th Street; South on 18th Street to R Street; East on R Street to 19th Street; South on 19th Street to S Street; East on S Street to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street and continuing south along a line extending 22nd Street to Retta Gilliam Court; South along the western portion of Retta Gilliam Court to T Place; Southeast on T Place to its intersection with the western boundary of Census Block 76.05 2002; Southwest along said western boundary of Census Block 76.05 2002 to Good Hope Road; West on Good Hope Road to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Ridge Place; West on Ridge Place to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to the eastern span of the 11th Street Bridge; Continuing north on said eastern span of the 11th Street Bridge to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to its intersection with a line extending 16th Street from the south; South along said line extending 16th Street to 16th Street; Continuing south on 16th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 19th Street and R Street; East on R Street to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to Q Street; East on Q Street to 25th Street; South on 25th Street to Naylor Road; Continuing south on Naylor Road to Altamont Place; Southwest on Altamont Place to Good Hope Road; Northwest on Good Hope Road to its intersection with the western boundary of Census Block 76.05 2002; Northeast along said western boundary of Census Block 76.05 2002 to T Place; West on T Place to Retta Gilliam Court; North along the western portion of Retta Gilliam Court to its intersection with a line extending 22nd Street from the north; North along said line extending 22nd Street to 22nd Street; continuing north on 22nd Street to S Street; West on S Street to 19th Street; North on 19th Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 19th Place and Good Hope Road; East on Good Hope Road to 22nd Street; Southwest from that intersection along a line connecting to the intersection of 17th Street and Morris Road; West on Morris Road to Bryan Place; North on Bryan Place to Bangor Street; East on Bangor S.E. to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to Butler Street; Northwest on Butler Street to the southwest corner of Census Block 75.03 2001; Clockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to 16th Street; North on 16th Street to W Street; East on W Street to its intersection with a line extending 18th Street from the north; North along said line to 18th Street; Continuing North on 18th Street to U Street; East on U Street to 19th Place; North on 19th Place to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street and Ridge Place; East on Ridge Place to 16 Street; South on 16th Street to Good Hope Road; East on Good Hope Road to 19th Place; South on 19th Place to U Street; West on U Street to 18th Street; South on 18th Street and continuing south on a line extending 18th Street to W Street; Northwest on W Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to its intersection with Census Block 75.03 2001; Counterclockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to Butler Street; Southeast on Butler Street to 16th Street; South on 16th Street to Bangor Street; West on Bangor Street to Bryan Place; South on Bryan Place to Morris Road; Northwest on Morris Road to Bangor Street; Northeast on Bangor Street to the alley behind the properties along the east side of High Street; Continuing northeast along said alley to Cedar Street; Northwest on Cedar Street to 14th Street; North on 14th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the eastern span of the 11th Street Bridge and the centerline of the Anacostia River; South along said eastern span of the 11th Street Bridge to 13th Street; Continuing south on 13th Street to Ridge Place; East on Ridge Place to 14th Street; South on 14th Street to Cedar Street; Southeast on Cedar Street, to the alley behind the properties along the east side of High Street; Southwest along said alley to Bangor Street; Southwest on Bangor Street to Morris Road; Northwest on Morris Road to High Street; Southwest on High Street to Howard Road; Northwest on Howard Road to Bowen Road; Southwest on Bowen Road to Howard Road; Northwest on Howard Road to South Capitol Street; Northwest on South Capitol Street to its intersection with the centerline of the Anacostia River; Northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8A07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Howard Road and Sheridan Road; Southeast on Howard Road to Bowen Road; Northeast on Bowen Road to Howard Road; Southeast on Howard Road to High Street; Northeast on High Street to Morris Road; Southeast on Morris Road to Pomeroy Road; Southwest on Pomeroy Road to Stanton Road; North on Stanton Road to Douglass Road; Northwest on Douglas Road to Stanton Road; West on Stanton Road to Sheridan Road; North on Sheridan Road to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 8B Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Altamont Place and Naylor Road; South on Naylor Road to Southern Avenue; Southwest on Southern Avenue to its intersection with Oxon Run; West along Oxon Run to its intersection with a line extending south from the western boundary of Census Block 73.04 1002; North along said line to the western boundary of Census Block 73.04 1002; Continuing north along the western boundary of Census Block 73.04 1002 to Savannah Street; East on Savannah Street to 23rd Street; North on 23rd Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to Suitland Parkway; Northwest on Suitland Parkway to its intersection with a line extending Pomeroy Road to the west; East along said line to Pomeroy Road; Continuing east on Pomeroy Road to Morris Road; Southeast on Morris Road to 17th Street; Northeast from said intersection across Fort Stanton Park to the intersection of Good Hope Road and 22nd Street; Southeast on Good Hope Road to Altamont Place; North on Altamont Place to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B01 Boundaries.

All streets located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Altamont Place and Naylor Road; South on Naylor Road to Good Hope Road; Northeast on Good Hope Road to 24th Street; Southwest on 24th Street to Wagner Street; Southeast on Wagner Street to 25th Street; South on 25th Street to Ainger Place; Northwest on Ainger Place to Bruce Place; Southwest on Bruce Place to Fort Place; Northwest on Fort Place to Erie Street; West on Erie Street to 17th Street; Northeast from said intersection of Erie Street and 17th Street along a line connecting to the intersection of 22nd Street and Good Hope Road; Southeast on Good Hope Road to Altamont Place; Northeast on Altamont Place to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Good Hope Road and Naylor Road; South on Naylor Road to Gainesville Street; West on Gainesville Street to Knox Place; Southwest on Knox Place to Hartford Street; West on Hartford Street to Langston Place; North on Langston Place to Ainger Place; Southeast on Ainger Place to Alabama Avenue; North on Alabama Avenue to 25th Street; Continuing north on 25th Street to Wagner Street; Northwest on Wagner Street to 24th Street; Northeast on 24th Street to Good Hope Road; South on Good Hope Road to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning on the intersection of Bruce Place and Ainger Place; Southeast on Ainger Place to Langston Place; South on Langston Place to Hartford Street; East on Hartford Street to Knox Place; Northeast on Knox Place to Alabama Avenue; South on Alabama Avenue to Jasper Street; Southeast on Jasper Street to its intersection with the northwest corner of Census Block 74.08 1012; Counterclockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to Shipley Terrace; East on Shipley Terrace to Buena Vista Terrace; Northeast on Buena Vista Terrace to 30th Street; Southeast on 30th Street to the District of Columbia— State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Suitland Parkway; Northwest on Suitland Parkway to its intersection with the southwest corner of Census Block 74.07 1000; North along the western boundary of said Census Block to its intersection with a line extending Gainesville Street from the west; West along said line extending Gainesville Street to Gainesville Street; Continuing west on Gainesville Street to its intersection with a line extending 17th Street from the north; North along said line extending 17th Street to 17th Street; Continuing north on 17th Street to Erie Street; East on Erie Street to Fort Place; Southeast on Fort Place to Bruce Place; Northeast on Bruce Place to point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Morris Road and 17th Street; South on 17th Street and continuing south on a line extending 17th Street to Gainesville Street; East on Gainesville Street and continuing east on a line extending Gainesville Street to its intersection with Census Block 74.07 1000; South along the boundary of said Census Block to Suitland Parkway; West on Suitland Parkway to its intersection with a line extending Pomeroy Road from the west; East on said line extending Pomeroy Road to Pomeroy Road; Continuing east on Pomeroy Road to Morris Road; East on Morris Road to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and Gainesville Street; East on Gainesville Street to Naylor Road; Southeast on Naylor Road to the District of Columbia— State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to 30th Street; Northwest on 30th Street to Buena Vista Terrace; Southwest on Buena Vista Terrace to Shipley Terrace; West on Shipley Terrace to its intersection with the southern corner of Census Block 74.08 1012; Clockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to Jasper Street; Northwest on Jasper Street to Alabama Avenue; North on Alabama Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and Suitland Parkway; Southeast on Suitland Parkway to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Oxon Run; West on Oxon Run to its intersection with a line extending 21st Street from the north; North along said line extending 21st Street to 21st Street; Continuing north on 21st Street to Savannah Street; East on Savannah Street to 23rd Street; Northwest on 23rd Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8B07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 21st Street and Savannah Street; South on 21st Street to Mississippi Avenue; Continuing south along a line extending 21st Street south to Oxon Run; West on Oxon Run to its intersection with a line extending south from the eastern boundary of Census Block 73.04 1003; North along said line extending Census Block 73.04 1003 and continuing north along the eastern boundary of said Census Block to Savannah Street; East on Savannah Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 8C Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of the center line of the Anacostia River and South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to Howard Road; Continuing south on Howard Road to Sheridan Road; South on Sheridan Road to Stanton Road; East on Stanton Road, S.E. to Douglass Road S.E.; Southeasterly on Douglass Road, S.E. to Stanton Road, S.E.; South on Stanton Road, S.E. to Pomeroy Road, S.E.; Southwest on Pomeroy Road, S.E. to Sheridan Road, S.F.; West on a line extending Pomeroy Road, S.E. west to its intersection with Suitland Parkway; Southeast on Suitland Parkway to its intersection with the southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001; Southwest along said southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001 to its intersection with the eastern property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital East Campus; Southeast along said property boundary to the southern property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital East Campus; Southwest along said property boundary to its intersection with Alabama Avenue, S.E.; Southwest on Alabama Avenue, S.E. to 11th Place, S.E.; South on 11th Place, S.E. to Trenton Place S.E.; East on Trenton Place S.E. to 13th Street, S.E.; South on 13th Street, S.E. to Mississippi Avenue, S.E.; West on Mississippi Avenue, S.E. to Wheeler Road, S.E.; South on Wheeler Road S.E. to its intersection with Oxon Run; West along Oxon Run to its intersection with 4th Street, S.E.; South on 4th Street, S.E. to Atlantic Street, S.E.; West on Atlantic Street, S.E. to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to Xenia Street, S.W.; Northwest on Xenia Street, S. W. to 2nd Street, S.W.; South on 2nd Street, S.W. to Atlantic Street, S.W.; West on a line extending Atlantic Street, S.W. west to its intersection with the centerline of the southbound lanes of Interstate 295; North along said centerline of Interstate 295 to its intersection with a line extending Rice Street, S.W. to the east; West along said line to Rice Street, S.W.; Continuing west on Rice Street, S.W. to Duncan Avenue, S.W.; North on Duncan Avenue S.W. to McChord Street, S.W.; West on McChord Street, S.W. to Chappie James Boulevard, S.W.; South on Chappie James Boulevard to Tinker Street, S.W.; West on Tinker Street, S.W. to Arnold Avenue S.W.; Continuing west on a line extending Tinker Street, S.W. to the west on line extending to Tinker Street, S.W. to the Commonwealth of Virginia-District of Columbia boundary line on the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; North along said shoreline of the Potomac River to its intersection with a centerline projection of the Anacostia River; Northeast along said centerline projection of the Anacostia River to the centerline of the Anacostia River; Continuing northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C01 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of the centerline of the Anacostia River and South Capitol Street; Southeast on South Capitol Street to Howard Road, S.E.; Southeast on Howard Road, S.E. to Interstate 295; Southwest on Interstate 295 to its intersection with a line extending the southwest property boundary of the St. Elizabeth’s Hospital Campus to the northwest; Southeast along said line to the property boundary of Sheperd Parkway; Clockwise around said property boundary of Sheperd Parkway to Lebaum Street, S.E.; Northwest on Lebaum Street, S.E. to 4th Street, S.E.; Southwest on 4th Street, S.E. to Newcomb Street, S.E.; Northwest on Newcomb Street, S.E. to 2nd Street, S.E.; Continuing on Newcomb Street, S.E. to the southwest to 2nd Street, S.E.; South on 2nd Street, S.E. to Oakwood Street, S.E.; Southeast on Oakwood Street, S.E. to Malcolm X Avenue, S.E.; West on Malcolm X Avenue, S.E. to its intersection with a line extending Waclark Place, S.E. from the south; South along said line extending Waclark Place, S.E. to Waclark Place, S.E.; Continuing south on Waclark Place, S.E. to Raleigh Street, S.E.; East on Raleigh Street, S.E. to Ester Place, S.E.; South on Ester Place, S.E. to Brothers Place, S.E.; Southwest on Brothers Place, S.E. to Highview Place, S.E.; Southeast on Highview Place, S.E. to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.E.; Southwest on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.E. to Sterling Street, S.E.; Northwest on Sterling Street, S.E. to Raleigh Street, S.E.; Continuing northwest on a line extending Sterling Street, S.E. to the northwest to Interstate 295; North on Interstate 295 to Malcolm X Avenue, S.E.; West on Malcolm X Avenue, S.E. to MacDill Boulevard, S.W.; West on MacDill Boulevard, S.W. and continuing west along a line extending MacDill Boulevard, S.W. west to the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary at the Virginia shore of the Potomac River; North along said shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending the centerline of the Anacostia River to the southwest; Northeast along said line extending the centerline of the Anacostia River and continuing northeast along the centerline of the Anacostia River to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Interstate 295 and Firth Sterling Avenue; Southeast along a line connecting said intersection to the western-most corner of Census Block 74.01 1039; Southeast along the boundary of said Census Block to Wade Road; Northeast on Wade Road to Sumner Road; Southeast on Sumner Road to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; South on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to Malcolm X Avenue; West on Malcolm X Avenue to Newcomb Street Northwest on Newcomb Street to 5th Street; Southwest on 5th Street to Oakwood Street; Northwest on Oakwood Street to 2nd Street; North on 2nd Street to Newcomb Street; East on Newcomb Street to 4th Street; Northeast on 4th Street to Lebam Street; Southeast on Lebaum Street to the eastern-most point of the property boundary of Sheperd Parkway; Northeast along said property boundary of Sheperd Parkway to its intersection with the southwest property boundary of the St. Elizabeth’s Hospital Campus; Northwest along said southwest property boundary of the St. Elizabeth’s Hospital Campus and continuing northwest along a line extending said southwest property boundary to the northwest to its intersection with Interstate 295; North on Interstate 295 to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the northern intersection of Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue and the property boundary of the St. Elizabeth’s Hospital Campus; Clockwise around said property boundary of the St. Elizabeth’s Hospital Campus to Alabama Avenue; Southwest on Alabama Avenue to 11th Place; South on 11th Place to Trenton Place; East on Trenton Place to 13th Street; South on 13th Street to Mississippi Avenue; West on Mississippi Avenue to Wheeler Road; North on Wheeler Road to Wheeler Hill Drive; West on Wheeler Hill Drive to its intersection with a line extending 8th Street from the north; North on said line extending 8th Street to 8th Street; Continuing north on 8th Street to Alabama Avenue; West on Alabama Avenue to 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Savannah Street; Southwest on Savannah Street to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; Northeast on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to Highview Place; Northwest on Highview Place to Brothers Place; Northeast on Brothers Place to Esther Place: North on Esther Place to Raleigh Street; West on Raleigh Street to Waclark Place; North on Waclark Place and continuing north on a line extending Waclark Place north to Malcolm X Avenue; East on Malcolm X Avenue to Oakwood Street; Northwest on Oakwood Street to 5th Street; Northeast on 5th Street to Newcomb Street; Southeast on Newcomb Street to Malcolm X Avenue; East on Malcolm X Avenue to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; North on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Savannah Street and 5th Street; South on 5th Street to Trenton Street; West on Trenton Street to 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Atlantic Street; West on Atlantic Street to 1st Street; North on 1st Street to Wilmington Place; Southeast on Wilmington Place to Horner Place; North on Horner Place to Upsal Street; West on Upsal Place to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; Northeast on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to Savannah Street; Northeast on Savannah Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C05 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of MacDill Boulevard, S.W. and Interstate 295; South on Interstate 295 to its intersection with a line extending Sterling Street, S.E. to the northwest; Southeast along said line extending Sterling Street, S.E. to Sterling Street, S.E.; Continuing southeast on Sterling Street, S.E. to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.E.; South on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.E. to Upsal Street, S.E.; East on Upsal Street, S.E. to Homer Place S.E.; South on Horner Place, S.E. to Wilmington Place, S.E.; Northwest on Wilmington Place, S.E. to 1st Street, S.E.; South on 1st Street, S.E. to Atlantic Street, S.E.; West on Atlantic Street, S.E. to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to Xenia Street, S.W.; Northwest on Xenia Street, S.W. to 2nd Street, S.W.; South on 2nd Street, S.W. to Atlantic Street, S.W.; West on a line extending Atlantic Street, S.W. west to its intersection with Interstate 295; North on Interstate 295 to its intersection with a line extending Rice Street, S.W. from the west; West on said line extending Rice Street, S.W. to Rice Street, S.W.; Continuing west on Rice Street, S.W. to Duncan Avenue, S.W.; North on Duncan Avenue, S.W. to McChord Street, S.W.; West on McChord Street, S.W. to Chappie James Boulevard, S.W.; South on Chappie James Boulevard, S.W. to Tinker Street, S.W.; West on Tinker Street, S.W. and continuing west on a line extending Tinker Street, S.W. west to the District of Columbia-Commonwealth of Virginia boundary at the Virginia shore of the Potomac River; North along said shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending MacDill Boulevard, S.W. from the east; East along said line extending MacDill Boulevard to MacDill Boulevard; Continuing east on MacDill Boulevard to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Howard Road and Interstate 295; South on Howard Road to Sheridan Road; South on Sheridan Road to Stanton Road; East on Stanton Road to Douglass Road; Southeasterly along Douglass Road to Stanton Road; South on Stanton Road to Pomeroy Road; West on Pomeroy Road and continuing west along a line extending Pomeroy Road west to its intersection with Suitland Parkway; Southeast on Suitland Parkway, S.E. to its intersection with the southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001; Southwest along said southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001 to its intersection with the eastern property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital East Campus; Northwest along said eastern property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital to its intersection with Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; North on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to Stanton Road; Northwest on Stanton Road to Wade Road; Southwest on Wade Road to its intersection with the eastern boundary of Census Block 74.01 1039; Northwest along the boundary of said Census Block to its western-most corner; North from said westernmost corner of Census Block 74.01 1039 along a line connecting to the intersection of Interstate 295 and Firth Sterling Avenue; East along Interstate 295 to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8C07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and 8th Street; South on 8th Street and continuing south along a line extending 8th Street south to Wheeler Hill Drive; East on Wheeler Hill Drive to Wheeler Road; South on Wheeler Road to Oxon Run; West along Oxon Run to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to Trenton Street; East on Trenton Street to 5th Street; North on 5th Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 8D Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Chesapeake Street, S.E. and Southern Avenue, S.E.; Southwest on Southern Avenue, S.E. to South Capitol Street; Continuing southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the District of Columbia—Commonwealth of Virginia boundary line on the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River; North along said shore of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending Tinker Street, S.W. to the west; East along said line to Tinker Street, S.W. to Chappie James Boulevard, S.W.; North on Chappie James Boulevard to McChord Street, S.W.; East on McChord Street, S.W. to Duncan Avenue, S.W.; South on Duncan Avenue, S.W. to Rice Street, S.W.; East on Rice Street, S.W. to Westover Avenue, S.W.; Continuing east on a line extending Rice Avenue, S.W. east to its intersection with the centerline of the southbound lanes of Interstate 295; South along said centerline of Interstate 295 to its intersection with a line extending Atlantic Street, S.W. to the west; East on said line extending Atlantic Street, S.W. to 2nd Street, S.W.; North on 2nd Street, S.W. to Xenia Street, S.W.; Southeast on Xenia Street to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to Atlantic Street, S.E.; East on Atlantic Street, S.E. to 4th Street, S.E.; South on 4th Street, S.E. to Chesapeake Street, S.E.; East on Chesapeake Street, S.E. to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of Chesapeake Street and the District of Columbia- State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along said District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Barnaby Road; North on Barnaby Road to Galveston Place; Northwest on Galveston Place to 6th Street; North on 6th Street to Chesapeake Street; East on Chesapeake Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D02 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Chesapeake Street, S.E. and 6th Street, S.E.; South on 6th Street, S.E. to Galveston Place, S.E.; East on Galveston Place, S.E. to Barnaby Road, S.E.; South on Barnaby Road, S.E. to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to its intersection with the southern-most point of Census Block 109.00 2002; Clockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to its intersection with Irvington Street, S.W. ; East on Irvington Street, S.W. to Joliet Street, S.W.; North on Joliet Street, S.W. to 1st Street, S.W.; North on 1st Street, S.W. to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to Livingston Road, S.E.; North on Livingston Road, S.E. to 3rd Street, S.E.; North on 3rd Street, S. E. to Livingston Terrace, S.E.; East on Livingston Terrace, S.E. to 4th Street, S.E.; North on 4th Street, S.E. to Chesapeake Street, S.E.; East on Chesapeake Street, S.E. to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Atlantic Street and 4th Street; South on 4th Street to Livingston Terrace; West on Livingston Terrace to 3rd Street; South on 3rd Street to Livingston Road; North on Livingston Road to Atlantic Street; East on Atlantic Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Chesapeake Street and Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; South on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to Galveston Street; East on Galveston Street to its intersection with the northwest corner of Census Block 109.00 1000; Counter-clockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to its intersection with South Capitol Terrace; South on South Capitol Terrace to Irvington Street; West on Irvington Street to its intersection with Census Block 109.00 2002 Counter-clockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to the District of Columbia -State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along said District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to the Commonwealth of Virginia—District of Columbia boundary at the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River. North along said shoreline of the Potomac River to its intersection with a line extending Magazine Road from the east; East along said line extending Magazine Road to Magazine Road Continuing east on Magazine Road to Chesapeake Street; Continuing east on Chesapeake Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southwest quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Forrester Street and South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to 1st Street; South on 1st Street to Joliet Street; Southwest on Joliet Street to South Capitol Terrace; North on South Capitol Terrace to its intersection with the southeast corner of Census Block 109.00 2000; Clockwise around the boundary of said Census Block to its intersection with Galveston Street; West on Galveston Street to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue; North on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue to Forrester Street; East on Forrester Street to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D06 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Brandywine Street, S.E. and 1st Street, S.E.; South on 1st Street, S.E. to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to Forrester Street, S.W.; West on Forrester Street, S.W. to Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.W.; North on Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, S.W. to Chesapeake Street, S.W.; East on Chesapeake Street, S.W. to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to Brandywine Street, S. E.; East on Brandywine Street, S.E. to the point of the beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8D07 Boundaries.

Beginning at the intersection of Atlantic Street, S.E. and Livingston Road, S.E.; South on Livingston Road, S.E. to South Capitol Street; North on South Capitol Street to 1st Street, S.E.; North on 1st Street, S.E. to Brandywine Street, S.E.; West on Brandywine Street, S.E. to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to Chesapeake Street, S.W.; West on Chesapeake Street, S.W. to Magazine Road, S.W.; Continuing west on Magazine Road, S.W. and a line extending Magazine Road west to the Commonwealth of Virginia—District of Columbia boundary at the Commonwealth of Virginia shore of the Potomac River. North along shoreline of the Potomac River to a line extending Tinker Street, S.W. from the east; East on said line extending Tinker Street, S.W. to Tinker Street, S.W.; Continuing east on Tinker Street, S.W. to Chappie James Boulevard, S.W.; North on Chappie James Boulevard to McChord Street, S.W.; East on McChord Street, S.W. to Duncan Avenue, S.W.; South on Duncan Avenue, S.W. to Rice Street, S.W.; East on Rice Street, S.W. and continuing east along a line extending Rice Street, S.W. east to Interstate 295; South on Interstate 295 to its intersection with a line extending Atlantic Street, S.W. from the east; East on said line extending Atlantic Street, S.W. to 2nd Street, S.W.; North on 2nd Street, S.W. to Xenia Street, S.W.; Southeast on Xenia Street to South Capitol Street; South on South Capitol Street to Atlantic Street, S.E. East on Atlantic Street, S.E. to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of ANC 8E Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001 and Suitland Parkway; Southeast on Suitland Parkway to Alabama Avenue; West on Alabama Avenue, S.E. to 23rd Street; South on 23rd Street to Savannah Street; West on Savannah Street to its intersection with the western boundary of Census Block 73.04 1002 South along said western boundary and continuing south along a line extending said boundary south to its intersection with Oxon Run; East along Oxon Run to its intersection with Southern Avenue; Southwest along Southern Avenue to Chesapeake Street; West on Chesapeake Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to its intersection with Oxon Run; East on Oxon Run to its intersection with Wheeler Road; North on Wheeler Road to Mississippi Avenue; East on Mississippi Avenue to 13th Street; North on 13th Street to Trenton Place; West on Trenton Place to 11th Place; North on 11th Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to its intersection with the southeastern property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital East Campus; Northeast along said property boundary to the eastern property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital East Campus; Northwest along said property boundary to its intersection with the southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001; East along said southern boundary to the point of the beginning [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E01 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of the southern boundary of Census Block 74.01 2001 and Suitland Parkway; Southwest along said southern boundary of Census Block 74. 01 2001 to its intersection with the property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital East Campus; Clockwise around said property boundary of St. Elizabeth’s Hospital to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to Congress Street; South on Congress Street to Savannah Street; East on Savannah Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to its intersection with the northeast corner of Census Block 73.04 1002; South along the eastern boundary of Census Block 73.04 1002 to Savannah Street; East on Savannah Street to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Alabama Avenue; West on Alabama Avenue to Stanton Road; North on Stanton Road to Suitland Parkway; West on Suitland Parkway to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E02 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Suitland Parkway and Stanton Road; East on Suitland Parkway to Alabama Avenue; Southwest on Alabama Avenue to 22nd Street; South on 22nd Street to Savannah Place; Southwest on Savannah Place to 18th Place; Northwest on 18th Place to Alabama Avenue; Southwest on Alabama Avenue to Stanton Road; North on Stanton Road to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E03 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant unless otherwise designated. Beginning at the intersection of 23rd Street and Alabama Avenue; Southeast on 23rd Street to Savannah Street; West on Savannah Street to 18th Street; North on 18th Street to Alabama Avenue; Northeast on Alabama Avenue to 18th Place; Southeast on 18th Place to Savannah Place; Northeast on Savannah Place to 22nd Street; North on 22nd Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E04 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Alabama Avenue and 11th Place; East on Alabama Avenue to Congress Street; South on Congress Street to Savannah Street; East on Savannah Street to 15th Street; North on 15th Street to Alabama Avenue; East on Alabama Avenue to its intersection with the northeast corner of Census Block 73.04 1002; South along the eastern boundary of Census Block 73.04 1002 to Oxon Run; West along Oxon Run to its intersection with a line extending 13th Street from the north; North along said line extending 13th Street to 13th Street; Continuing north on 13th Street to Trenton Place; West on Trenton Place to 11th Place; North on 11th Place to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E05 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of Wheeler Road and Mississippi Avenue; East on Mississippi Avenue to its intersection with a line extending 13th Street from the north; South on said line extending 13th Street to Oxon Run; East along Oxon Run to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to 12th Street; North on 12th Street to Bellevue Street; Southwest on Bellevue Street to Wheeler Road; North on Wheeler Road to the point of beginning [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E06 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 4th Street and Oxon Run; Northeast along Oxon Run to Wheeler Road; Southeast on Wheeler road to Barnaby Street; Southwest on Barnaby Street to Atlantic Street; West on Atlantic Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Description of SMD 8E07 Boundaries.

All streets are located in the Southeast quadrant. Beginning at the intersection of 4th Street and Atlantic Street; East on Atlantic Street to Barnaby Street; Northeast on Barnaby Street to Wheeler Road; Southeast on Wheeler Road to Bellevue Street; Northeast on Bellevue Street to 12th Street; Southeast on 12th Street to the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary; Southwest along the District of Columbia—State of Maryland boundary to Chesapeake Street; West on Chesapeake Street to 4th Street; North on 4th Street to the point of beginning. [July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-157, § 2(a)].

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-157 provided:

“Applicability of boundaries.

“(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the ANC and SMD boundaries set forth in section 2(a) shall apply as of January 2, 2013.

“(b) The ANC and SMD boundaries set forth in section 2(a) shall apply for purposes of administering the November 6, 2012 election, including determining qualifications for candidacy and the residence of a person signing a nominating petition for the November 6, 2012 election.”

Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-157 provided:

“Succession.

“(a) Except as provided in this section, each ANC shall be the successor in interest with regard to any assets, obligations, or agreements of its predecessor previously established by law.

“(b) The successor in interest to any agreement with an ANC as of December 31, 2012 shall be the ANC within whose boundaries the subject of the agreement is located. For purposes of this subsection, the term ‘agreement’ shall include any voluntary agreement executed pursuant to Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code, any agreement relating to a Planned Unit Development, zoning variance, or special exception, and any agreement relating to historic preservation.

“(c)(1) The financial assets of the ANCs in Ward 5 shall be collected on or after December 1, 2012, by the Chief Financial Officer, who shall then redistribute them on an equal per capita basis to the new ANCs in Ward 5 as soon as practicable after January 2, 2013.

“(2) The personal property of each of the ANCs in Ward 5 shall be transferred to the new Ward 5 ANC within which the property was located in 2012.

“(3) The records of each ANC in Ward 5 in 2012 shall not be destroyed by the 2012 ANC but shall be transferred to the appropriate ANC having primary interest in the matter to which the record relates. The financial records of each ANC in Ward 5 shall be transferred to the District of Columbia Auditor.

“(d)(1) The financial assets of ANCs 2C and 6C shall be collected on or after December 1, 2012 by the Chief Financial Officer, who shall then redistribute them on an equal per capita basis to the new ANCs 2C, 6C, and 6E as soon as practicable after January 2, 2013.

“(2) The personal property of ANCs 2C and 6C shall be transferred to the new ANCs 2C, 6C and 6E within which the property was located in 2012.

“(3) The records of ANC 2C and 6C in 2012 shall not be destroyed by the 2012 ANC but shall be transferred to the appropriate ANC having primary interest in the matter to which the records relates.

“(e) The assets, obligations, and records of each 2012 ANC in Ward 7 shall transfer to the new ANC in Ward 7 created by this act that primarily represents the same geographic area.

“(f) The Chief Financial Officer, in coordination with the Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, shall reapportion the quarterly allotments for the periods on or after January 2, 2013 based on the requirements of section 738(e) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 824; D.C. Official Code § 1-207.38(e)) and the new ANC areas established by this act.”